A nice place for lunch.  Inexpensive, fresh and pretty yummy. A few comments: Parking.  Park on the street!  The alleyway parking is a nightmare to navigate, and not worth the trouble.  Find street parking and walk. Appetizers.  The Tom Kar soup was nice, albeit slightly on the sweet side.  It was rich, had a variety of ingredients [they'll customize to whatever protein you desire] and overall enjoyable. We had some fresh spring rolls.  The filling was crisp, flavorful and excellent.  The dipping sauces were equally savory and refreshing.  The only downside was the actual wrapper.  It seemed to be a very thick, pasty wrapper and just was a huge distraction to the rest of the appetizer.  I would have rather had a thin, rice-based wrapper.  This was simply too thick and likely the worst part of the meal. The drunken noodle main entree was very nice.  The tofu was spongy and cooked nicely.  The tomatoes were super fresh, and the entire plate was colorful, healthful and filling.  Very delicious! Great value for the money.  Corkage fee is rather steep [$15/bottle], but we had a nice lunch for two for ~$30, and I was very impressed with the value.  Would definitely go back.
came here by 9pm on a week day, it was very lively and joyful inside. ordered the beef asian eggplant with sticky rice, it was delish! best thai in the area so far!
Not much parking, but the inside of the restaurant looked nice and clean. Items on the menu were roughly around $11. What I really valued about this place was their plating and food styling. They really made the dishes look pretty upscale. I got the pad thai and it was a pretty big portion in my opinion. Not exactly the best pad thai I've ever tasted, but it was still good and made me happy. I recommend this place!
I typically don't change my ratings but I've bumped this establishment up to 5 stars. This place is in my humble opinion the best place to get lunch in the ENTIRE Palo Alto area and without a doubt the best Thai place in the Palo Alto/Los Altos/Mt. View vicinity. Yes the parking is not great, but there are many places to park around the place. I think my willingness to find parking speaks to quality of the food/service since most places I would rather "pass" on if there was no available parking.  Several establishments along El Camino and University Ave. would fit this bill. The service staff is extremely friendly and personable and they have great lunch deals.  Great food, service and good prices for the quality of food earn it 5 stars from me. It's not a surprise that this place gets really busy during lunch M-Fri.
Nice spot for lunch, has quickly become one of the more popular lunch venues in PA. The parking... Read more 
If you've skimmed the other reviews, you've probably already heard this, but I'll say it one more time: parking is terrible here! The alley behind the restaurant is not only sketchy, but cramped and dirty. We ended up finding parking two blocks away and walking over, but it may take some time. The restaurant was pretty empty when we stepped in on a lazy Sunday night, and we had our choice of seating. My first impression was that it looked rather bleak on the inside. While it was certainly more tasteful than some of the gaudier Thai restaurants I've been to, I couldn't shake the "just-moved-in" feeling of a new apartment. A few more paintings on the wall or potted plants could help bring some life to the place. I ordered the Pumpkin Curry with brown rice, while my boyfriend chose the Pad Thai with shrimp. Service was prompt, and, we were both pleasantly surprised at how beautifully the food was presented! It definitely looks like they put thought into the arrangement. As for taste, I found my pumpkin curry rich and delicious, if a bit spicy for what I asked (mild). Unfortunately, the Pad Thai wasn't as much of a hit; both of us thought the noodles tasted a bit strange, though the shrimp looked good. Overall, not a bad dining experience! A bit more expensive than Siam or Thaiphoon, but makes up for it in presentation. Next time, I'd like to try Lotus over on California, as I've heard it's favored by the local Thai community (plus, parking won't be such a pain).
Read the reviews that parking is limited here, and after going through the tiny parking lot, seeing the signs to park in the alley, then seeing a bunch of NO PARKING signs, I grew aggravated and parked on the street far away. Of course, walking to the restaurant near 1 PM, I start to see a bunch of street parking in front of the restaurant. I was determined to try this place, and had high expectations after the parking hassle. Stepped in and it was quite busy at the end of the lunch hour. My friend and I did not receive a menu or water right away. After 10 minutes, we finally were asked if we had a menu as we couldn't flag anyone down. Waitress hands us 2 menus, and 30 seconds later, I kid you not, she asks if we're ready to order. It was both of our first time here, so we needed a longer look, and asked her to give us a minute. Sheesh. I ordered the drunken noodles with beef, medium spicy, since I read all the warnings in past reviews, and she ordered the pad thai with shrimp. Oddly, it said 3 of the noodle dishes, including mine, did not come with rice, soup, salad, and egg roll, but less than minute later, we were both given soup. It wasn't as sour as I have had at past thai restaurants, reminded me of a vegetable soup. 2 minutes later, we're given our entrees, which were on a pretty triangle plate, and I was so suprised at how good it looked, given the short amount of time it came out in. I really liked the salad with the peanut dressing. The egg roll was okay, but not usually a fan of veggie egg rolls. My drunken noodles were good, but not spicy at all. Had to eat my favorite peppers that I asked for with it. The beef was not good though, very tough and dry. I didnt eat any after the first bite. My friend's pad thai was really good too, lots of big shrimps on the dish. By the time we finished, we were the last patrons there. Meal for 2 was $19 plus tip. Not bad at all. The food here is really good, but I wish they had a larger parking lot and better service.
Good food and service. Portions sizes are decent. The ambiance is nice too. Drunken noodles: Delicious. I just wish the portion size was larger because I could eat two of these. Sizzling duck: amazingly tender, moist and not too fatty. Served on a bed of veges which is nice. Must try if you're a duck lover.
South of Stanford, this is definitely a go to place for Thai. Recently, I had one of their very reasonable  lunch specials, the eggplant curry w/ chicken. It came with a small salad, rice, a spring roll and creamy soup. I was impressed with their food, service and decor. Will be back for more!
Great food and great service. We tried a few dishes and everything was very tasty. Pad See Eu- Pan-fried wide rice noodle with eggs, broccoli, carrots, chicken and black soy sauce Asian Eggplant-  Eggplant stir fried with bell pepper, mushroom, tofu, and fresh basil with chili garlic sauce Red Chicken Curry
Decided to go out for some Thai food for lunch on Wednesday. Took a quick look around on Yelp and found this awesome place. Headed on over and had some seriously tasty Thai. The good: Food was amazing! I had the drunken noodles and like previous yelpers have said, it is really good! I asked for medium spicy and it was really spicy. My friend asked for spicy and it was SUPER spicy. The drunken noodles had ample noodles and came with an egg roll and small salad. The egg roll was crisp and had some sweet sauce that was not overpowering. The not so good: The service was slow. Once we ordered and got our food, no one came to check on us and we had to flag down a waiter to get our bill. The bad: Parking. There are only 4 spaces on the side of the building. There is street parking, but it can be super hard to find (unless you go to the other side of the street). Water refills. When you serve spicy food, one would think you'd be all over filling water glasses, but apparently you would be wrong. We had to ask to have our glasses refilled. Overall, the food was so amazing that it warrants 4 stars. Be prepared to look for parking and flag down waiters though. And spicy means SPICY.
Very nice food. Little bit pricey than regular Thai restaurants but still good food.  We ordered : Roti with green curry: for $7.50 its not worth it, very small portion. Taste was OK. Panang Curry: Very tasty, good quantity Sesame noodle: Good quantity, decent taste.
Note to self: when it's your first time at a Thai restaurant, start off with medium spicy. Don't get all daredevil and ask for SPICY. I ordered the green curry lunch special for less than $9. It came on a nicely presented plate with rice, salad and an egg roll. Egg roll was delicious. We also got served soup which was pretty spicy too. I got full pretty quick- I'm guessing it's because the green curry was super spicy. That's ok- it's in the fridge for lunch tomorrow. oooh, I can't wait to sweat again during lunch tomorrow. I know these curry dishes get spicier the day after! My only complaint (as well as others at my table) was that we had to ask for water refills. If I was serving spicy food, I'd be sure to have someone walking around refilling cups. But hey, I'm not yelling. Food was great. I'm surprised it wasn't super packed for the lunch rush. Oh, wait I know why! PARKING SUCKS! Prepare to park across the street and do some illegal running across the interection!! Fine.... be safe and don't get a ticket. Use the crosswalk :)
Rice Thai is awesome - full of tasty dishes. The owner is very nice and accommodating. We went with a few friends and he quickly had the waiters move the tables to make sure we were comfortable. The panang curry is amazing. The pineapple fried rice is as good as it gets and the drunken noodles are fantastic. Since I love spicy food, I always ask for their pepper with fish sauce to make my dishes even spicier. This place is great for tasty Thai food. I'm definitely coming back even though parking is very limited. It's totally worth it.
Came here with some friends and went family style so we got to try a bit of everything.  Pad thai, pad se ew, panang curry, lemon grass crispy fish, roti.  Yum yum and yum!!! The pad thai and pad se ew were pretty standard. The roti was delicious and came with a yummy curry sauce.  The lemon grass crispy fish came with a beautiful presentation and a yummy fish sauce.  The panang curry was the dark horse that won by surprise! It was so flavorful and addictive.  So good!!!! Eating here makes me want Thai food all the time!! Yum!
Delicious Thai food... I wish I could have tasted it.  Not seeing a star (indicating spicy) by the Thai Basil Chicken dish, I asked for it "spicy."  In my vocabulary, I meant to ask that it be a bit spicy, as opposed to mild.  I did not mean to indicate that I wanted it 10 on a scale of 10.  I drank 2 Thai Iced Teas, about 12 glasses of water (seriously), and a whole thing of rice before I admitted defeat and gave up. Seriously, I almost died.  Minus two stars for attempted murder.
Still pretty good Thai food at Rice Thai, including a decent pumpkin curry, but there is one major problem that keeps me away more and more: Parking. As in a way too little. There are only 5 spots for a restaurant that seats over 50.  Not surprisingly, the spots are always full. Plus, adjoining businesses strictly enforce their own parking, and the few street spots are always jammed as well. It doesn't help that Rice Thai has exploded in popularity in the last year or so. Service seems to have taken a dive too. On my last visit they took my order quickly enough, but then forgot about me.  Twenty minutes later they asked me what my order was again - ooooh, not a good sign.  I was late for a meeting at that point, so I just asked them for it "to go".  Then I walked the 3 blocks to my car and sped back to work. I was able to eat my lunch eventually, a few hours later.  The experience didn't exactly make me want to come rushing back here. Since my rating reflects how likely I am to come back, I feel a downgrade is necessary. Hint to Rice Thai: How about moving locations please?
Yet another good Thai spot that's close to work makes for a happy Dan. Even more so when they make... Read more 
Great overall experience. Food is very good and service is super-friendly. Atmosphere is good as well. Just be warned : Spicy food here is very spicy.
The wait is insane for the food to come out. When fellow yelpers wrote about the slow service, they were not exaggerating. Waited about 20 minutes for even my appetizer to come out. Ridix much? Pad thai was a disappointment. Skip that. Pumpkin curry? Sure it was good. I loved their roti the best. Super buttery. Comes out with fried egg plants. The curry sauce that it comes with was tasty. Parking is near impossible. Park in next plaza and walk over. Place isn't big. Wouldn't bring  a large party here. Friendly waiters/waitresses, just slow. They were apologetic. Still doesn't help when I'm a hungry bear.
My family and I have lived in Palo Alto for close to 20 years.  We have experienced excellent Thai food over that time. Some more expensive than others.  We really like this place. The curries are special. The ingredients are fresh and the flavors are layered.  I am surprised by any negative reviews. This place is consistent and has excellent food. The lunch specials are a great value.  There are a lot of choices for Thai restaurants and we keep coming back here. The place is clean and the service is excellent.
The green curry roti was amazing and both the pineapple and red curry did not disappoint. I would recommend this place to all my good friends.
This place is totally over-rated !! Food is expensive as compare to it's food quality and ambiance... Taste of food - too average, nothing special about it; and everything is on the salty side ... Decor and ambiance - not so good either ...  very plain with minimal decor... Parking lot is a pain, there is parking space for like only 4 cars... Most important of all - Service was Poor !!  There was only very few customers there, but it was very slow...  and the worst thing was their unfriendly attitude... Conclusion: Unimpressive 2.5 stars....
I've been here twice now, and will be coming back time and time again in the (very near) future. A lot of thoughtfulness and care is clearly put into the food - dishes are spiced perfectly, woked plates taste fresh and clean (not drowning in sauce or wilting with too much heat), and the curries are pretty amazing (I love the panang, green and pumpkin). The indian roti is also a nice treat! Dishes may be a touch on the spicy side for some, but just right to me! The staff is really friendly and disarming, and the place is comfortable and inviting. Dining in feels really natural here - the decor is just a touch nicer than eating at home, but not so much to make you feel stilted or overly conscious of being "out". I'm not even quite sure what I mean by this - maybe just that the people and space here put you at ease :) Don't over think it, this is a great place to eat!
Unimpressive dinner: 2.5 stars. AMBIANCE: Felt like a pretty wide open space, which was the complete opposite of how Rice Thai's horrific parking lot situation made me feel.  FYI there's a tiny lot out front-- if you can't find any spaces there, you have to maneuver your way through an incredibly short and narrow lane to get to a back alley.  There are a few spaces to parallel park in the alley, but be prepared to do 100-point turns in order to squeeze your car into a space.  It took me quite a while to find and secure a parking spot, and by the end of that ordeal I had a massive headache. SERVICE: Friendly enough... but SO FREAKING SLOW.  Everything crawled at a snail's pace; bringing menus, bringing utensils, taking orders... we waited about 10-15 min after we ordered before our waters arrived.  The food preparation was also kind of slow for the type of place it is, but wasn't offensively so.  A laid back, nothing special meal here took over an hour, and J & I are quick eaters who only ordered 2 dishes. FOOD: - Drunken noodles w chicken ($9.95): The noodles themselves had very good flavor (nice balance of savory, spicy and sweet) but everything else in this dish was BLAND BLAND BLAND.  The veggies and meat had no flavor whatsoever, and were slightly undercooked.  The noodles however, were a smidge overdone, and ended up slightly mushy. - Green curry w pork ($9.95): Good flavor, nice amount of spicy (medium) which was countered with creamy coconut milk.  However, the veggies again were slightly undercooked (the eggplant was borderline raw... not a fan), and detracted from the overall appeal of the dish. - Steamed jasmine rice ($1.25) OVERALL: I found the food to be average; nothing to write home about.  It was the service, and the painful parking situation that really knocked Rice Thai Cuisine down a few notches for me.  I wouldn't mind returning if someone else suggested it (especially if I didn't have to drive), but I probably won't be back on my own.
I moved to SF from Palo Alto almost a year ago and I STILL haven't found a Thai take-out that comes close to Rice Thai on El Camino. - The Tom Yum soup is just absolutely fantastic. I can't come in here without ordering it, regardless of how much other food I'm getting. - Drunken Noodles: delicious - Green Curry: The best I've had in the Bay Area, and he'll add extra thai eggplant, which some places in the city don't even include (!) When I was still in school, my parents HAD to come here everytime they came to visit, sometimes directly from the airport. Senior year my friends and I were easily in here once a week. It's certainly not the nicest place you'll ever visit, but for a reasonably priced, efficient and delicious Thai meal it's the best. If anyone can suggest a Thai delivery in SF that comes anywhere close to this old favorite I will be eternally grateful!
I really liked the ambiance and decor of this place.  Very contemporarily simple, but spacious and clean.  The presentation was also fantastic.  My table ordered the pad thai, drunken noodles, and yellow curry--all were beautifully presented. My drunken noodles were above average.  Good flavor, though the beef was not very good.  Not really sure why, but a lot of Thai places seem to really skimp out on the meat quality.   I had a bite of the yellow curry and that was pretty good as well. The cons:  Parking!!! A tinyyyyy lot, and if you dont find a spot there, you are left navigating your way around back alleys you wound't think exist in Palo Alto. Also, the service was a bit slow, given the fact that there was only 1 waiter when we were there.  Hopefully they hire more staff during peak hours.
I'm sold!  why?  2 reasons: 1) can order brown rice 2) dishes are not greasy! fine, 3 reasons: 3) fast, friendly service alright, I have many more reasons: 4) delicious fresh food 5) plenty of vegetarian options 6) pleasant atmosphere 7) reasonable prices We enjoyed the samosas (a little small and overdone), #16 soup, Asian eggplant tofu wok, broccoli tofu wok & green curry tofu on medium-hot spicy level. I'm excited for my leftovers!
Dinner at Rice.... Started with a tremendous wait and complete feeling of, "Do they know we are here?" I finally waived the server down and ordered Satay because what Thai place doesn't have Satay.  Our four top was given three menus. The four top to our right eventually got my Satay even though their order hadn't been taken either.  They came in after us by about ten minutes and ended up with thier dinner before us. The two top to our left got their dinner before us also and came in after us and the other table. Eventually we were served the Pad Thai from the table to our right. there was about a ten minute wait between our fist plate and the fourth plate at our table.  Service was the worst in long time. Satay:  Tander Chicken.  The runniest Peanut Sauce I have ever had at any Thai restaurant.  Salad garnish was brwon and old. The Mussaman Curry was good but watery.  Lose sauce again.  Maybe thats their goal but again. Not like any other Thai place I've been at. Bottom line.  I would not go back or recommend Rice.
I've been here for two coworker goodbye lunches, and both times the food was very delicious. Get a Thai iced tea with lunch for sure! I love the ordering system for spiciness. I asked for "mild" my first time, and the waiter said that was a 2. A coworker wanted "spicy" and the waiter said that was a 4. So naturally I asked, "what's the highest number?" Waiter: "that would be a 10" I don't know if this requires a waiver like on Man vs. Food, but it was worth a laugh from coworkers. I ordered a 3 the second time for spiciness and thought neither a 2 or 3 was spicy for my curry. I've ordered green curry chicken and pumpkin curry with chicken and thought both were excellent. Lots of great flavor and plenty rich with the coconut milk, but not overpowering. Next time I'll get a 4 (which is tonight). Look ma, I'm growing up!
I don't know why there is so much hype about this place/why it's rated so high.  The food was mediocre but pretty pricey for the quality.  The service was pretty bad--It took 10-12 minutes for me to get a spoon, fork, and napkin. They charge you for rice.  They do have a brown rice option. The food was pretty bland.  The curry was watery.  The peanut sauce was very watered down, and they only put a very tiny bit with our chicken skewers.  The pad-see-ew was loaded with vegetables and very bland. The wait for a table is pretty long, but I don't understand why. I would not recommend this place.
Great meals I have tried: Spicy squid salad (perfectly hot, fresh seafood, great taste), Duck Curry (perfect mixture of spice and coconut), and Lemongrass Chicken so far. While I was disappointed with the chicken (which was overcooked and nothing special), the other meals blew me away. Fantastic fresh ingredients and delicious rice. If you come here for lunch, you get a free soup - great taste! For a dessert, make sure to try the coconut sweet-salty sticky black rice. It is to die for. The restaurant is very clean, the decoration is subtle yet stylish. The service was always flawless, and the older male server is the most friendly, funny person. Prices are low, and plates never look too fancy - but still are beautifully plated with vegetable decorations. A nice touch!
This is my favorite thai food spot in Palo Alto.  Everything I have tried here is good. The parking is terrible but I always park across the street at the bank! The food is worth the extra few minutes trying to park.
I've consistently come here for lunch more than a few times and I'm glad to have a delicious Thai staple in my rotation. I really love the complimentary soup they give you at the beginning of your meal. I always want more, but I think it would be rude to ask for a second bowl... and I also remember I always JUST finish my meal or have leftovers... so I should save room. I do love the pad see ew, but have ventured into trying and LOVING the pumpkin curry and the Asian eggplant.  DELICIOUS!  The pineapple curry is also tasty, but a bit tOo pineapple-y.  Asian eggplant is seasoned well and I love the consistency of this dish. The Roti that comes with a green curry is a tasty appetizer.  Thai iced tea is also a favorite of many at this place. Yum yum.
Really strange small parking lot right off of El Camino... but once you get past that or park on the... Read more 
Came here for take out lunch.  Not bad I must say.  Prices for their lunch plates were very reasonable and the staff was pretty nice.  I loved that they have on site parking, which could sometimes be challenging on El Camino.
After a long flight from Chicago, my fiance and I decided to take our taste buds on a trip as well.  Also we love Thai food. They seated us right away on a weeknight.  The menu looks great, standard expansive Thai offerings with lots for a vegetarian to choose from.  I got the Pineapple Curry, and my fiance ordered the Pad Thai-- both with tofu and vegetables. His pad thai came out 5-10 minutes before my curry, which was really strange to us.  Also, the portions aren't that big for the price... Plus rice doesn't come with the curry dishes, which was a bit of a surprise to me. But I weigh most of my evaluation on the taste of the food, and Rice Thai had me there.  The pineapple curry was delicious... rich and creamy, citrusy... I couldn't stop pouring that sauce over the C-cup dollop of brown rice I unwittingly paid two bucks for. (Although, the tortilla chip stuck in the middle of my curry bowl was a little strange.) Unfortunately, the pad thai wasn't such a hit.  The tofu was marinated and cooked in some strange kind of citrusy-vinegar juice that clashed with the peanutty and savory flavor of the pad thai.  The peanuts were served alongside the noodles, and peanuts aren't so easy to mix. I have a hard time giving less than three stars for delicious curry-- but it's a pretty tenuous three stars, between the service and the value and the pad thai and the Pepsi and the bizarro presentation choices.
I've had a few different entrees here but none of them measure up to the Sea Bass Green Curry. That stuff is like candy. Savory curried candy. The service, though, is hit-or-miss, and I've noticed a slight decline over the last year and a half (I've been about six times). Maybe I'm imagining things.
Tried the Pad Thai and Bangkok Chow Main... The Pad Thai was with thin noodles, and didn't have the typical Pad Thai taste to it. Something seemed a bit off. Not sure if this is their specialty or if they just like doing things differently than all the other Thai places I've been to... The Bangkok Chow Main was good, had plenty of vegetables and the thick noodles. All in all, this place was decent--quirky decor, looks like they were trying to be upscale on a tight budget. The staff was friendly and attentive. So, I might give the place a try if I'm back in the area and craving Thai food that is different from the pack...
Avoid when busy.  They have no sense of customer service.  Togo order was late - fine they were busy.  Paid early so I could get out sooner.  Food showed up and no one told me.  Kept me waiting another 15 minutes while it got cold on the counter.  Here's the most amazing part: after calling and speaking to the manager, she never once offered to say she was sorry until I pointed it out to her neither she nor any of the staff had done so. Edit: another thing, she spend several minutes explaining to me why they can't keep their promises to customers when they get busy and how it was my responsibility to chase them down to get my togo order - until I pointed out that I had paid early and there was a credit card receipt to prove it.
Wandered into Rice Thai Cuisine for lunch today and I was pleasantly surprised.  We had the combo appetizer, Larb salad and Green Curry with Chicken.  The appetizer was  huge and yummy. The server asked how we would like our Larb salad spiced.  We chose spicy.  It was DELICIOUS!  The Green Curry Chicken was very tasty and flavorful.  The service was pleasant and efficient.  The presentation was awesome. I eat a lot of Thai food and I thoroughly recommend this restaurant (as it seems there are not a lot of "REAL" restaurants in this neighborhood anyway).
I came to Rice Thai Cuisine when I was in the Palo Alto area for a trip. I had lunch here and they had the lunch special. I believe I had the Chicken Pad See Ew with Thai Iced Tea. It was delicious and cheap too considering that they have a lunch special. It is a cute place to eat at along El Camino Real. I would recommend coming here for lunch since it is definitely worth it!
Cam here with friends the other day. We ordered several different dishes to share among us, just so we'd get a chance to try more things. The pumpkin curry we had with chicken, and it was quite good, even though I'm not a curry lover. We also got the eggplant dish, which while tasty, was nothing spectacular. The pad Thai was okay, but since I rarely have pad thai, if ever, I don't really have a point of comparison other than with my taste buds. Then we shared some fried banana with ice cream, which was actually really good, and the mango with coconut rice for dessert. Their coconut rice was amazing, even though the mango w/ coconut rice dish was not all that spectacular, just slices of mango and a scoop of rice. The service, contrary to other reviews, was actually quite nice. Well, one server in particular, who while occasionally awkward was extremely sweet. For our entire meal, we paid $62 including tip. Pretty good considering it's Palo Alto, but I was expecting the servings to be a tad bit bigger. Thankfully we weren't that hungry, so we walked away satisfied. Overall, I found the meal to be decent, but nothing spectacular (as I was hoping it would be, since it had 4 stars).
Rice Thai is my go-to Thai restaurant in Palo Alto. The lunch menu is a great deal as most dishes also come with soup and/or salad with imperial rolls. I typically pick up take-out for dinner about once a week also. Food:  The pad see ew and pad thai are delicious. My hands down favorite item on the menu is the regular noodle soup.  It is such a soothing dish with a delicious chicken broth and perfectly cooked rice noodles. The bean sprouts add the perfect amount of crunch and I always ask for extra vegetables.  If I am feeling under the weather, it is the first thing I crave. My fiance loves the chili beef dish that they serve only on their dinner menu, which consists of perfectly marinated beef over the mongolian type of fried rice noodles.  We have not been able to find it at any other restaurant. Great Thai food is really hard to beat. I used to get take-out Thai when I lived in Russian Hill at least once a week. Without Rice Thai, I would feel very deprived of my much needed weekly Thai food fix. The food at Rice Thai is always solid and the owner, Ricky, is super friendly and always greets you with a smile. It is hard to think of a better place to go to in Palo Alto than Rice Thai for a casual lunch or dinner where your expectations for delicious food and good service will not be let down.
I've taken my college-age daughter here twice and we've been impressed each time.  The food is well-prepared and attractively served and the service is friendly and fast.  I've had the green curry and Asian eggplant and (IIRC) my daughter ordered the swimming angel each time and the food was delivered quickly, was attractively plated (on lovely square plates) and served hot.  The serving sizes are not overwhelming, but (to me) about right for lunch.  My only gripe is that parking is very limited and the lot itself is rather tight.  If you drive a dreadnaught-class  SUV you might find it difficult to park.
Rice Thai is a good, casual Thai restaurant conveniently located near Barron Park in Palo Alto.  You may get better Thai food elsewhere (e.g. Erawan Thai in Redwood City) but if you want Thai and you're in Palo Alto, this is the place to come.  I like it more than Siam Royal or Thai City.  Prices are typical for Palo Alto.  You will get cheaper Thai food further south or in Thailand.  We live nearby so we come here more often than most.
I really enjoy Thai cuisine and this place is definitely the best in Palo Alto! Their dishes are served well, taste delicious, and it's always fresh and great quality. I especially recommend to try out their Chicken Satay, Chicken Dumplings and Drunken Noodles - it's simply the best in the area! The service is fast and very friendly, I've never been waiting for the food for more than 5-7 min. And by the way, I don't have any problems with parking, since I always leave my car at the nearby plaza (right near the gas station) and just walk for 30 seconds :)
I don't frequent Palo Alto as much as I'd like, so naturally, I defer to Yelp for recommendations when it comes to good eats. My lady was craving thai, and Rice Thai popped up as one of the top rated results in Palo Alto. Reading through some of the reviews, we could tell that some of the more recent ones have been pretty mixed. But hey, overall four star still? Definitely worth giving it a try. *Delicious & what'd you expect from a good thai restaurant.* The exterior of the building doesn't look like much; in fact, with just a regular drive by you would miss this restaurant completely since it looks pretty run down from the outside, with the exception of a little cute decors. The interior ambiance though, shifts into a casual but family-intimate ambiance. The service was friendly and the food was delicious, and exactly what you would expect from a good thai restaurant. We ordered the chicken red curry with jasmine rice (rice is an extra $1/bowl), and a chicken pad thai. In all honesty, I use pad thai as a standard to judge the food at thai restaurants. It's because it's such a staple dish, but at the same time, I have had such a HUGE variation on the way pad thai tastes that it's ridiculous. (Have you ever had pad thai that literally tasted like ketchup? Because I have. Yuck.) That and I was craving noodles and she was craving curry. :) We only eyed the chef specialities for half a minute before deciding that none of them seemed worth the detour from our cravings. (Truthfully, they sounded pretty Americanized. And some of them sounded Chinese..and we wanted strictly Thai food.) Reading through some of the reviews here, I think that was probably a good choice on our part. Overall, we had our food come out surprisingly quick (then again, we were having an early dinner so it was just us), and the meal for two came out to be about $20 at dinner price. (Cheap!) Would definitely recommend and would be back here again if I'm in the area craving thai food.
Came for lunch with coworkers. The place is really packed.   Parking could be better. Food was okay.  Got the beef red curry which was long on veggies and very very light on beef.  I guess with prices being the way they are in Palo Alto, something has to give.
In A Nutshell: *I came back again after a 2 year hiatus with a friend for lunch. *Two years and nothing's changed, but gotten worse.  The service absolutely stinks here. *The Papaya Salad was missing the authentic flavor it's supposed to have, the worst ever! Overall, don't come here.  It was surprisingly packed with a younger crowd, but read my post, I would avoid this place and check out another Thai restaurant.
In A Nutshell: *This is one of three Thai restaurants closest to my work on El Camino (between W... Read more 
Food: Mediocre but better than some Thai places. So far, the best thing I've had there is the Pineapple Curry, everything else was mediocre and not that memorable (e.g. tom yum soup, tom kha soup, mango chicken, sweet and sour pork, drunken noodle, mango sticky rice, crispy fish with lemongrass sauce). Portion: More on the skimpy side. Very skimpy on the meat. Ambience: Family-friendly. Clean and quite modern. Service: Friendly and good enough. Relatively fast. Parking: Scarce. They do have a lot that fits like 3 (or 4 maybe 5) cars with 1 dedicated handicap spot to the right of the restaurant. (oh no! I spilled the beans, now I won't be able to find parking there anymore...). Getting out of the parking lot is a pain though. Restroom (female): SO CLEAN!
Tried the green curry everyone is raving about and I'd say it was average and not very flavorful. The curry was thin and not actually sticking to the rice.  Pad Khee Mao was disappointing and had far too many broccoli pieces in it for my taste.
Solid 4 stars. We were pleased with everything we ordered samosas, eggplant, drunken noodles, pineapple fried rice. With the exception of the samosas the portions were fair to generous. The atmosphere is nice, attractive decor, romantic lighting and not too loud even with the place packed. The prices were decent too :) This will be a restaurant I will return to.
Good for vegetarians too.  I love their Pad Thai noodles. Good and friendly service.
Had a great meal here.  I was in town running errands and wasn't really sure where to grab food.  So a friend and I just randomly looked up a Thai place on my GPS and went to the closest one, which I feel was a pretty brave move considering we had no way to look up ratings before we went.  But I'm a glass half-full type of girl, and everything worked out in the end. The waitresses were really nice and let us pick whichever table we wanted.  Booth lover here!  So I was happy as a clam.  It was really empty when we first arrived.  Like, we were the only ones there.  But I'm either really lucky or bullheadedly optimistic because the food came out amazing.  I ordered number 43 which was the egg plant dish and choose the vegetables and tofu option.  It doesn't come with rice, but it's only $1 for a bowl of Jasmine rice which was a good portion.  Friend ordered the beef patay which came out really tasty- it didn't even need lemon! The drinks here are totally worth bragging about.  I ordered lemonade expecting them to give me some sugary Minute Maid junk.  Well they showed me, their lemonade was fresh!  It was pretty darn good, and I didn't really expect that from a Thai place.  The Thai tea was amazing as well- mixed well and creamy. We finished all the food and liked that it didn't over-bloat us.  I was full, but not a bad food coma type of full so that was nice; we left happy. Btw, parking on the street seemed like a total hassle so we just mooched off the parking at Jamba Juice.
meh... So this isn't an absolute review, it's a relative review.  This place was fine... clean inside and service was great... food was ok, not bad, but in general there's no reason to go here instead of Krung Thai.  Here are the minor problems I had with this place: 1. No parking.  Not their fault, but does not make me want to come here. 2. The soup they give you is small and mostly cabbage.   Flavor is so-so 3. I don't like how the non-curry entrees are served on a huge leaf of lettuce.  All the sauce gets stuck on that piece of lettuce and you can't really sop it up w/ your rice.  I guess you can eat the lettuce, but it's so soggy, it'd be like drinking your lettuce. 4. The protein (chicken and tofu is what I saw), were small (tofu) and stringy/thin(chicken). 5.  The tofu seemed dried out and unappetizing.  I'm told that's normal and it's firm tofu.  Maybe I'm not used to firm tofu like that. 6.  The eggroll was OK, but I like the eggroll and wonton piece w/ the dipping sauce you get at Krung Thai. 7.  This place isn't cheaper. I mean this place is fine, I should have ordered the Pad Thai or a curry I guess.  I should probably give it 3 stars, but I'm sticking w/ 2 because I probably won't come here again and it doesn't compare to my Thai standbys.
Great thai food! doesn't make you feel sick or sleepy after you eat it! they have an extensive menu to accommodate all.
Very good food and service
This is one of the best thai restaurants in palo alto. The food here is really good and they have excellent service. You can also order takeout and they are very fast.
Wow, the green curry is amazing. It was so good, it was hard to stop eating! Even when I was full! The huge downside to this restaurant is parking: the lot can fit 4 cars. If you can't find a spot here, you have to park on El Camino and walk. We had to park on the other side of El Camino. But, it is worth it and I'm sure we'll be back.
The food wasn't bad, but the service definitely was! I wanted to plan a small wedding celebration with friends for my sis and her husband, and she requested something easy, not too fancy, and Thai food. After a few searches on Yelp, I checked out several different places and chose Rice Thai to have the celebration. I really liked the large interior space, which was great for our group of 12, and the decor was pretty. The manager, at the time, was extremely accommodating to our needs. A few days before the special night, I called the restaurant to make sure they had our reservation. I didn't remember the manager writing down my  name or number or anything for the reservation, and it was going to be a Saturday night, so I just wanted to make sure. But the person on the other end didn't recognize the name of the manager I gave her, Ricky, and she was trying to tell me that I called the wrong restaurant. Ugh. I ended up not talking to Ricky and just had faith that our table would be there on Saturday night. Come celebration night, a few of us got there early to do a little decoration. I asked to speak to the manager to let him know that we were there and also to ask if we can put in our order ahead of time before the other guests got there. The waiter left, and then came back to tell us that the manager just said to give him the order. Well ok then. We gave the waiter our order. We also had a homemade two-tier wedding cake that we weren't sure if they had space in their fridge for. So again I wanted to speak to the manager about it, but again he didn't come out. So I just gave the waiter the cake to take care of. During our time there, the manager never came out. He just sent his servers out to take care of whatever my request was. Really I just wanted to say "thank you" in person, but he must have been too busy. Matter-of-fact, we were pretty much ignored most of the night. We called a waiter over to bus the tables, then we called them again to ask to bring the cake out, and AGAIN to bring plates, cutting knife and forks. The place was not busy at all, so I could not understand what the deal was with service, or lack of. At the end of the night while we were walking to the door, the manager finally showed face and thanked us for coming. He even had the nerve to ask us to write a Yelp review. Well, here's your review.
Best Thai in a long time. You get a lot of food for the lunch special and the price is reasonable.
I came back a second time to verify. No bueno.
This little Thai restaurant has its own small parking lot. I never noticed it until I yelped "Thai"... Read more 
Solid Thai food, reasonable prices, and clean restaurant (and bathrooms). Can't wait to go back. Pumpkin curry definitely had a bite to it and the flavor was really good. Better than many others I've had.
Review for my Roast Duck Curry dish Lack of duck and duck skin Curry sauce was tasty $12.95 dish but does not include "rice" Service - decent. Odd when there are just a bunch of people sitting there eating and chatting but no music in the background. Parking - Street parking on ECR but traffic whizzes by quickly. Not sure if I will be back.
We went there last night for dinner, the food was great, the green Curry with bread rocks...the Green beans were precious, the Chicken Hot-Pot was also very good, however the glazed fish was just ok, I wish they still had the whole fish style rather than  the new cut up pieces. Service could be a bit better, only the owner and a young helper toc lean the tables, so it was a bit slow,  but overall I would definitely go again for the food.
This rating is for the shrimp pad see eww:  I've only been here once and I feel like it's enough to rate this restaurant.  My friend took me here for lunch and they served me one of the best pad see eww dishes I've ever had.  It tasted just right and most importantly - not too greasy.  They gave about 6-7 pieces of shrimp with it, two egg roll halves and salad.  Not a bad meal for $9.50.  The noodle portion is smaller than what usual Thai places would serve, but I also appreciate that for the purpose of avoiding over-eating!  My new favorite Thai lunch spot in Palo Alto!
A truly tasty meal - yum.  Rice Thai Cuisine is kind of easy to miss as you're driving down El Camino, but I'm glad I finally got to try it. - Green curry: 5 stars - Drunken noodles: 5 stars - couldn't get enough of this one! - Cashew nut with your choice of meat : 4 stars - Pad thai: 4 stars No complaints about service or ambiance.  I'll be back!
Boyfriend and I came here for dinner the other night. The place was empty so we were greeted and seated right away by a kind of socially awkward waitress. She seemed really shy and kinda mumbled her words when she spoke. I ordered the birds nest, crispy egg noodles with shrimp, chicken, and veggies. Boyfriend ordered the sweet and sour salmon. Our dishes were served right away, which was nice because we were kind of under a time restraint, so we got to eating. The first thing both of us noticed was that both of our dishes tasted fishy. The salmon seemed to be dipped in batter and fried, and it definitely could have been fresher. Fishy fish equals no bueno. The sauce was good though, as well as the veggies and the pineapple chunks. My dish was fishy as well. The weird thing was the shrimp didn't taste fishy very fishy, although the texture was a bit off for me, but the chicken did taste fishy. And I'm not talking about fish sauce fishy. I'm talking about bad seafood fishy. It kinda made me lose my appetite a bit, although the veggies were fresh and the noodles and sauce were really good. The portions were on the smaller side--we both finished all our food. I think it was more of a lunch portion rather than dinner, but I guess for such good prices you've got to expect less food? Who knows. I'd give it a second chance. It's right around the corner from my house, is reasonably priced, and has great potential. My only suggestion for them would be to make sure their seafood is fresh.
Still go here once and a while, the food stays great and consistent.
This place is new, clean and a great family run thai kitchen. The atmosphere is calming and... Read more 
Friday night and the staff waved off everything to do with us. After sitting for 20 minutes a someone clearing the table next to us asked us for our order, without pen or paper; 10 minutes later a lady came over and incorrectly told us our order. After correcting her politely she quickly left to the kitchen without so much as a smile of acknowledgment of our existence. Once plates came for our appetizer we noticed one was sticky with previous food and requested a change which wasn't acknowledged at all and once a new one came the sticky one looked to be placed in the pile of clean dishes to divvy out once more. We mentioned to each other that we felt like second class citizens at this place. Our appetizer came only minutes before our meal and was actually lovely Roti. Out curry was very floral and had a good kick to it. I suggest the food and not the service.
not your average Thai place! Familiar dishes, but better.  fresher, less greasy. Also many dishes that you don't find on a regular Thai menu. Very nice decor, and efficient and kind staff. Can't ask for more. I'd say tell all your friends, but shh, we don't want it to get too popular!!
This was the first time that I ordered take out, and whilst we were very disappointed I can say that the manager was very helpful and offered us a discount if we were to return. 1) The flavor of the chicken and cashew nut was great, but there was no cashewnuts... 2) The pad thai had eggshells in it
I totally remember this as a ratty taqueria that happened to serve pretty good tripitas tacos back in the day. My how things have changed. That place was a shithole and looked slightly offputting. Rice looks super sleek and clean. Got their blanket shrimp starter and my usual roast duck curry for lunch. Solid all around. Even in south Palo Alto you'll be paying a bit of their rent prices but this place is pretty tasty and definitely one of the better Thai joints in the area
Rice Thai, where have you been all my life?! you are my current new FAVORITE for Thai food in the south bay... yummy! came here today with the besties, to try a new place for lunch... Thank you Yelpers for this awesome rec! the DRUNKEN NOODLES with Chicken was my favorite dish of our meal. I'm still curious as to WHAT makes it drunken? Sweet and spicy, and uber flavorful.. yum! the ASIAN EGGPLANT with BEEF Was also quite tasty! Veggies were nice and fresh, and beef was nicely cooked too... it was amazing with the Brown rice too! the special for the day was the PUMPKIN CURRY with SEAFOOD... damn this was good! With bite size chunks of pumpkin.. it was so flavorful and delish! awesome place for a quick lunch with great friends... Love!
Decent place for fast take out. The chicken massaman curry and the veggie pad thai were both flavorful and good for a quick meal. A little over priced for the quality of the food.
Great Thai food! This place opened when I was living only a couple blocks, and my boyfriend and I very quickly started picking up take-out here on a regular basis once or twice a week. The food is delicious, the owner is very friendly, the decor is nice and conveys a sense of serenity, and for Palo Alto the prices are very reasonable especially given the generous portions. Another great thing is that the food is very flavorful without being needlessly oily, so you don't feel like you're compromising your arteries every time you eat out. Some of our favorites are the drunken noodles with chicken or tofu - miles and miles away the best of its type, and the eggplant with chicken is delicious with plentiful eggplant and very tender chicken.  I'm not as crazy about their pad thai, which seems a little on the sweet, bland side but with many other great choices to pick from, I'm not bothered by this at all. Another one, the chicken lemongrass coconut soup (tom ka kai), is a delicious treat. The broth is delightfully rich and complex. In fact, when I had my wisdom teeth taken out, that same day I requested this soup without anything solid in it. The owner was very sweet and accommodating and strained a large container of it for me! Thank you! One other consideration is that the parking lot is tiny and hard to navigate around it, which is common in this part of Palo Alto. Do yourself a favor and park along the street.
One of my favorite thai places for sure. Unlike Krung Thai, their complimentary soup doesn't suck. Nice and tangy and coconuty. Their curries are all very good.  Not too watery, not too thick, good solid flavor, not too salty.  Decent portions.  The side salad is good too, with a super peanutty dressing (that i know some people don't like, but i love it personally).  Egg roll that comes with most meals is not bad, not great. I've also tried their coconut-based noodle soup.  Good tang and good amount of coconut in it.  All their meats are pretty good.  I mean, we're not talking prime cuts here, but they also aren't so crappy that you're gonna spend 1000 chews on each piece like at some other ghetto ass chinese restaurants. Oh, and there thai iced tea is legit.  And i know my thai iced tea.  Good size too for the price, not like some other places that give you something the size of a freaking capri sun and charge you 2.50 for it. Warning: parking sucks ass.  4 slots, 1 handicapped spot, otherwise it's street parking.
Fresh, party for the eyes as well as the palate. Will be back!
WHERE ARE THE BEAN SPROUTS?! This is what I asked when we opened our take-out box of pad thai. The pad thai looked extremely bare... I don't even think there was any egg or peanuts. The noodles also tasted too sweet. Definitely had better. We ordered two other dishes- the chow mein (which the hostess recommended) was the best of the 3, and the cashew nut chicken... well, it was decent, but I've also had better elsewhere. The outside of this place is deceiving... after passing by it numerous times, I was convinced that it was a fast-food/take out place based on the tacky, blinking "open" sign in the window and the cartoonish looking "Rice" sign in front. But once you step inside you can tell it's trying to be a nicer sit-down restaurant. Unfortunately, prices match more with the inside.
I came here again for dinner for the 2nd time and when it comes to food, i'll be giving it a 4 star rating, but as service can use some improvement, overall rating is 3 star. Food: The menu is mostly generic Thai food, but then you also have the Chef's special, which is a little different from what you normally see from your regular Thai Restaurants: i.e. Chiang Mai I ordered: Roasted Duck Curry: This is the 2nd time i've ordered it and i must say when it comes to being consistent, Rice does not disappoint. The curry was just as good as i remembered it, not too heavy, and the duck was yummy! House Salad: This is definitely Thai/Western salad with a twist. It was served with a peanut sauce that was a bit tangy, but not too much, and was served with fresh lettuce and chicken, very yummy and i recommend it as something to share prior to your meal! Thai Ice Tea: A must have for most if not all meals in a Thai restaurant. :) Service: Overall service was good but there might have been slight language barrier. This is not a showstopper by all means but can definitely improve upon. Ambience: Well lighted, simple yet elegant deco, Not too noisy, excellent choice for intimate dinners.
Another great recommendation by yelp!  Ok price for lunch, and the taste is pretty good Pumpkin curry ($8.5) - very nice curry and with a good kick of spice.  The pumpkin tasted yummy Coconut Noodle($8?) - the coconut soup had a nice flavor, and the chicken was nice and tender.  (an extra star for not chewy and over cooked meat) Lunch came with salad and egg roll;  The egg roll  didn't seems to be fresh fried as the skin was chewy. Small little place, there is only 4-5 parking spots in parking lot. If you see parking on street, may want to take it.
I got: Pad Thai lunch plate. I ordered it to go so it didn't come with the soup. It came with salad and egg roll. I also got a Thai iced tea. It was about $13.00. The Pad Thai was delicious (I got it with chicken), not too many bean sprouts and not too many peanuts. The noodles were a little greasy towards the bottom but it was still hot and good. :) The salad sucked, I am not a fan of out of the bag ice burg mix with peanut dressing. Blah. The egg roll was veggie only with vermicelli noodles. Very tasty. The service was fast and great. I had my little puppy waiting in the car, so dude offered to come and give me my order when it was ready! That is great customer service. :) If I am in the area and craving some pad thai, I'd forsure come back.
This is my new favorite Thai place!! The food is great and the service was good! We came here for lunch and ordered the lunch specials but shared them.  My favorites is the pumpkin curry with seafood.  It had a wide mix of squid, scallops, mussel and the curry was excellent!!  Drunken noodles with Chicken tasted delicious and the chicken wasn't dry!!  Eggplant with Beef also was an excellent choice!
Seriously....who now a days has a $20 requirement for credit charges!? =O LAMEEEE!! Its a good thing I went to the bank and pulled a $20 out before having lunch with my friend or Anita and I would have been washing dishes right now. =/ So decided to meet up with an old friend of mine whom I hadn't seen in a while working in Palo Alto today. This place is very cute and I love the decor. They have a bench running along the back with pretty plush pillows to use as back support. Food here is really affordable which is a plus! $7.99 for my green beans and tofu in chili sauce. This included a small cup of soup and a really pretty triangular platter with rice, salad, egg roll and the main entree. Servings are very generous here. Anita had the Drunken Noodle with veggies and tofu. I thought my dish was good....nothing fabulous but good quality food. The bill came to $17 for the both of us...what a deal!! I pulled out a $20 and Anita decided to pay her portion with her debit card. Gentleman told us that there was a $20 limit for card transactions!???? Huh???!! What a huge letdown! My thoughts on this place went down the toilet after hearing that. No big deal though.....I treated Anita for lunch with my $20 and we went on our way. Food: 3 stars Service: 3 stars (my friend asked for no ice with her water and they brought her out water with ice....not listening!) Parking: What parking??!! Good luck finding some! One less star for the $20 limit for cc transactions....LAME! C'mon people this is Palo Alto...who carries cash these days!!??
This is now my new go-to spot for a Thai lunch. Yep, my old favorite Thai City, is gettin' the boot. Rice Thai is my friends favorite place. I'm so glad she took me here for lunch because I probably would of never came here on my own. The view of the restaurant from the street is not impressive. One wouldn't expect such a classy and sophisticated interior. I was pleasantly surprised when I walked through the door. Polite and attentive staff - check Creative and pretty dish presentation - check Generous portions - check Very affordable dishes - check I had the Red Curry with chicken lunch special for $7.95. The amount of food you get for under $8 is just to good of a deal. The curry sauce had a good kick to it. I also enjoyed the side salad with peanut dressing. Overall great flavor in every bite. I do have to comment on the parking...or lack there of. It's really awful. Your best bet is to find street parking on the Camino. Don't even bother with the teeny tiny excuse for a parking lot along the side of the restaurant. So try not to let this inconvenience keep you from experiencing a great restaurant. I love venturing out of my comfort zone and trying new places. Even better when they end up becoming one of my favs.
Rice Thai has better curries than Lotus Thai, but Lotus wins on the roti. The red curry with tofu is really excellent and a take out staple for me! Limited parking.
Let me first clarify - my four star rating is not because this is an amazing Thai place that I would go out of my way to just eat here - it is a combination of different things that make this place my default lunch place when I crave Thai for lunch. Positives: (1) Location - My office is at El Camino and Page Mill Road, so there's limited choices for lunch (California Ave is too crowded and PA downtown is a bit of hassle for quick lunch).  Rice Thai is just a 5-10 drive so promixity is a major plus. (2) Fast service - Everytime I go, I tell them that I am in a hurry and I always get the food in less than 15 minutes. (3) Healthier options - I normally get Sweet Thai Chicken (made with Chicken breast) or drunken noodle lunch sets - the food is not overly greasy and you can get brown rice instead of white rice.  In addition, I always ask for low oil in all dishes and the dishes do come back not as greasy as other places Recommendation: (1) Would go earlier if you can:  Parking lot is a little tight - so if you go before noon, you should be able to get a good parking. (2) Lunch sets:  they are a good deal, soup, crispy egg rolls.  Good even for take-out
Came here many times and so far all the dishes we've tried are very good.  The only let down so far was Chiang Mai noddle.  It was great when it came out, but then we got busy eating other dishes and the noddle soaked up too much sauce/juice and it became too sour for our taste.  My favorite is the lemongrass crispy fish,  the sauce works so well with the fish and goes with the rice too.  I also like their tom yum soup and sizzling seafood & sizzling duck a lot. Hubby's favorite is garlic pork. Not so much a curry person so can't really comment on those.  Although their portion, like most Palo Alto restaurants, tend to be on the smaller side comparing to south bay restaurants.  For me the drawback of this place is that they tend to be slow when they are busy, and we will end up having to flag them down for water and stuff.  Parking is also not so great, a very small parking lot on the side which you have to circle to the back to get out.  But these are just small problems and won't affect my love for Rice Thai.
A very pleasant lunch with family.  Ordered Pad Thai as a sure thing, knowing my mother was ordering the Asian Eggplant with chicken which we could share.  Wish i'd ordered the eggplant.  Delicious!  Beautiful, bright purple Japanese eggplant, fresh lightly sauteed veggies and flavorful basil. Pad Thai very good and as we hadn't requested spicy (so I could share with my mom) it was light.  I requested chili sauce,  which was promptly brought to the table, so I could bring the level of heat, to a portion of the dish, to my desired level. This is the third family visit and excellent on each occasion. Only negative... a neighbor tables conversation drowned out our own.
The food here was really good. The service was great as well. The menu had a good variety. Definitely recommend the roti w/ green curry, drunken noodles, and Asian eggplant. Really tasty. Plus, you can adjust the hotness levels to your liking as well.
Did not dig the Crispy lemon grass fish.   Ordering off the chef speciality menu is hit or miss. My recommendation - stick to the noodles and rice dishes.  they are all around winners.
Pad Sew Ew and other noodle dishes - hard to go wrong Read more 
3 starts because even though the food was great, the service was...... not good. felt like they were racists. We came in and sat before these two caucasian females. They took their orders first when we were there 5/10 minutes before. Had to wave down the waitress for more water. They need customer service classes. I'd still come back for the food
I've been here twice for lunch.  The prices are ok, not super cheap but not super expensive.  Probably $10 after tax & tip if you choose the Chicken, Beef, or Pork option. On my second visit, I decided to  get noodle soup.  It's beyond me on why they would name something "Regular Noodle Soup" but I decided I'd give it a try, my dining companion tried it before and said it was good.  When I placed the order, I asked what type of noodles are served with it.  The waiter said Pho noodles.  I said I don't like Pho noodles, can you replace it with the wide rice noodles (ho fun).  He said no, we don't have those.  I said, but you serve Pad See Ewe, you have to have the wider rice noodles.  So the waiter said they just don't the substitution.  I then let my dining companions order and when he came back to me, I was still looking.  I couldn't decide, so I decided not to order.  I sat there while my dining companions got their appetitzers and entrees and ate. Why would you not make the accommodation?  How inflexible is that?  He didn't even give me a reason, maybe I should have asked.  Would my dish have tasted drastically different served with different noodles?  WTF. I'm not coming back.
It's hard to find good Thai food around Palo Alto, but Rice Thai Cuisine is a solid, reliable option. I'm not crazy about the green curry (it's a little too mild for my taste), but I like the cashew nut chicken a lot! The lunch specials are a great deal -- entree, spring roll, soup and salad for $8. If I were just reviewing this place on the food alone, I would probably go with three stars, but the lunch specials deserve an extra star.
I've been to Rice for lunch several times and I think that it has good bang for the buck.  I also like it better than any of the other Thai places in the vicinity, or even in downtown Palo Alto. The lunch specials, in particular, are a great value - a ton of food for about $8.  You get soup, salad, a small spring roll, rice and your entree.  Green curry, basil, and green beans (all with chicken) were excellent.  The food is flavorful, but not overly spicy, so if you're looking for fire, you may be disappointed. I've tried two of their soups - the coconut and the hot & sour.  I don't love hot & sour soup, but the coconut soup was good. Waitstaff are friendly and efficient.  I'm not in love with the seating.  The banquettes are hard wood, with a tiny pillow propped up behind you for cushion (I ended up sitting on mine), while the chairs are a bit minimalist.  One good thing is that the place is large enough for bigger groups (6-8 people) to be seated together without imposing on smaller groups of customers.  The decor is fine - nothing to write home about - and the place looks a bit spartan. Parking is also a disaster.  If you don't get one of the four spots in their "lot" in an alleyway North of the building, you're stuck scrounging for street parking or worse, trying to park in the Jamba parking lot a few blocks down.  This is the one true negative about this place.
LOVE IT!!! I knew I would. I don't know how but I knew it.  It was really a surprise when I walked in there. I thought it would be a whole in the wall spot because it looked so small from the outside. BUT NOPE!!! This is definately a business lunch, friends lunch, romantic date spot. I think my meal came to like $9 but WHOA it's big!!! I just ate left overs today. It came with a spring roll, salad and pad thai. I asked for extra spicey and extra peanuts and it was done perfectly.  I couldn't believe how many noodles they packed into that little box. I scooped it onto a plate to mix it bettter and the plate was over flowing.  They have a good choice of items on their menu and I can't wait to go back. My two negative comments are: 1 - $20 minimum credit card charge 2- The salad had peanut sauce on it and it was good but a lot of peanut sauce... actually I did like it so I really have no idea why I'm listing this under my negatives. LOL so ok only one negative. I'll make sure to take pictures next time. Which should be next week HE HE
The food is not bad, though some items contain more cabbage than actual meat. They offer brown rice which is great. The service, however, will be their downfall. The staff is very nice and accommodating, when you can actually get one of them to address you. You are seated relatively fast, but then left to your own devices long after you've perused the menu thrice. I actually waited 10-15 minutes to order once. Then its a wait for water or drinks, the food, and the bill. If you are really relaxed and not in a rush, this place isn't bad. The food is ok, not greasy but not superbly amazing either, just ok and for the price it isn't a bad deal at all. But beware if you're going for a business lunch or have to be somewhere afterwards, they are too understaffed to get you in and out quickly and often will serve half the table, with a 10 minute wait before the other half gets served so be prepared. Also the parking stinks, an accident-prone tight-spaced endeavor, walk to it if you can. So all in all a solid 3 stars, I originally had 2 but I still frequent it so it can't be that bad right?
Totally average americanized style Thai food. Think of all the thai restaurants you have been to that haven't been great, haven't been bad, and aren't totally memorable? That's this place. Great spot for a decent meal, but nothing special. Service is friendly. Prices pretty cheap. When I'm in town for business I'll come here for something quick and easy.
Good thai place. I'm vegetarian and there seemed to be a fair number of options. I had the pumpkin curry which was pretty good. Spicy is only moderately spicy. (Not Thai Spicy). I went for lunch portions were just right for about $10.
So the last two times I came here it was just okay.  Did they change the cook?  We ordered the Drunken Noodle and the Ginger Beef last night and it was kind of bland.  I was so disappointed as this was my favorite local Thai spot. Last time we were here we ordered the massaman? curry.  It used to be thicker, now it's like it was watered down, but still flavorful.  Then the soft shell crab was kind of soggy. I think I'm going to try somewhere new first.
THAI NOW!!! My uncle recommended this place and I have to say, he was RIGHT! The curry sauce is... Read more 
This is the kind of restaurant I love to visit...a small, family-run place that's trying really hard and doing everything right. I've visited a handful of times now and every time the same two staffers (owners?) greet us warmly.  The restaurant itself is on a very nondescript block of El Camino and you can easily zoom by without noticing it (look for the neon lights of Happy Donuts as your cue to slow down).  However inside the place is casually but fairly elegantly decorated in neutral tones and Thai art.  (No gaudy golds here).  Fellow patrons seem to be low-key local families and occasionally police officers taking a dinner break.  A number of local folks seem to get take out as well later in the evening. The food itself is very solid - I've liked everything I've tried thus far.  The lunches are really generously portioned (soup + salad + spring rolls and a large portion of your entree for $7-8) and the dinners don't disappoint either.  The prices are pretty reasonable (though the roti appetizer is a little bit high at $7.50) but mostly in the $8-11 range which given the portions seem totally fair.  The curries are great (not too watery and packed with veggies / meats) and the stir fried dishes and noodles are fresh and not too greasy. This has become one of our casual go-to places for a weekend dinner or lunch with family or friends.
LOVE THIS PLACE -- have been here a few times. Very reasonably priced and great food. It's also somewhat quiet and so is a great place to catch up with a friend over a tasty meal. That also means, though, that if you're looking for a rockin' night out this is probably not your place. Things that are awesome: pumpkin curry, drunken noodles, pineapple fried rice. I'm sure other things that are delicious too... just haven't branched out yet. AND they do takeout! yay!
I had no clue this place even existed and it is right along El Camino. Walked in to Rice with a 10 coworkers for lunch last week and we got a table right away.  For lunch, the portions are quite large.  I had Pad See Yew , a spring roll, salad and soup and I believe it was all for $9, and it fed me for lunch the next day. It is a great lunch deal and this is now our affordable Thai lunch option at work.
Curry is great! I have tried other dishes but found the rest to be mediocre. Service is so-so and usually prefer to take out.
Great food and service!  I frequently get take-out and never have to wait more than 10 minutes for my food, even on a busy night.  The staff are all extremely friendly and efficient.  Highly recommended!
I really want to rate this higher! The staff was very friendly, the restaurant is comfortable and cute. The portions are generous. And the price is cheap. But... The taste of the food is average.  The Pad Thai dish I ordered tasted like greasy fried eggs. Maybe I came in on the cook's off day, I'll give the person the benefit of the doubt and try one more time before I move on.
Amazing restaurant and great service!
We went there for a lunch with a 2 year old child, on Saturday. The only people except us was a company of cops on a  lunch break, which made me feel very secure. The owner was very attentive and the portions were generous.  The food was a mixture of Thai and general oriental food, but I ordered chicken curry for personal reasons - for me Thai restaurants and curry go way back.  And I was not disappointed. My little one demanded more rice, which was brought to us free of charge.  Twice. Overall, very nice, relaxing dining experience.  And cheap, too! I think they deserve extra half-star for rectangular-shaped places ;)  Haven't seen those for a while.
I have been here only for lunch and I always, literally always get the Bangkok Chow Mein lunch special and its really really awesome. It comes with a small bowl of soup (changes everyday) a very small salad with a peanut dressing and a veg. egg roll...Very clean place and the food is presented well. The Bangkok chow mein here is the best I have had, its really really yummy with egg, fried tofu, veggies and a nice stir fry sauce... Others in my group have had the curries (green, red, mussamman, yellow) and they are also fairly good, the chef knows what he is doing, the place is clean, lunch special is $8 - $10 a person, service is quick = 5 stars....
This is for take-out only. Went on Sunday around 6:30pm and they were friendly and VERY fast with our order.  Food was better that we expected compared to several other Thai restaurants we have tried in the Palo Alto area.  I don't think there is any great Thai restaurants here, but good will suffice.  Price is VERY reasonable.  Fresh Salad roll was a bit bland but the other items - chicken curry and eggplant were both good. I would go back.  Items were package well for take-out so everything was hot and fresh when we ate at home. To dine in the place looked clean and nicely designed but parking would be tricky on a busy day / eve.
So I realize that I may be slightly biased in writing this review (oh my!), but honestly the fact that I live a block away from Rice and have gone there enough times that I know the owner personally, really just compels me to write an honest and accurate account of how delicious this place is! I'm not much on logistical issues, but I should mention that they are a smaller local restaurant with an attentive but minimal waitstaff, there is parking for about 4 cars on the side of the building but street parking also available out front, and they take cash or credit (take out is super fast too). But the reason I come back here again and again is the food! The chef here creates some of the most mouth-watering dishes and presents them in beautifully ornate forms. I would say that the traditional Thai cuisine critic may be lost on these culinary creations, but anyone with a love of Thai food and a bit of an open mind would immediately find themselves in an indulgent experience worthy of repeat. All of the dishes have a unique and inspired take on the Thai aesthetic. One of my personal favorites is the sweet and sour salmon. The layers of breading are so light that you would hardly think it similar to its thick-skinned counterparts at your local Chinese shop, and the lightly garnished glaze gives just enough kick to the already full-flavored fingers of salmon. Just delicious.. My advice: don't be afraid to experiment, everything that I have tried on the menu has turned out to be a new favorite
Interesting to have Thai served by the Joker and Pirate Girl but they get props for at least being in the spirit of Halloween. Now on to the review.... FIrst off, can I just say parking SUCKS.  They have 4 spaces on the side and the rest is street parking.  Try to park on El Camino Real at night - not my favorite thing to do.  It is a busy street. Since I had a tough time getting parking, I was expecting to see the place packed.  It was practically empty. hmmmmm, like I said parking sucks. Service was meh.  It took them awhile to come and take my order.  Now, I love Thai but a spice whimp so I know better than to tell the  anything other than mild.  They didn't hear me and my order came back medium.  I didn't realize that is what the server put in until I saw my check.  Not happy, but I will know the next time to e-nun-ciate MIIIII-LLLD, NO SPICY! I did  like the presentation and the food overall.  But just wasn't completely wow-ed.  Thus, they get 3 stars.
Very nice find!  And the portions, well, they're huge.  You won't find this price in SF no sirree. They also use gluten free soy sauce!  You just need to let the server know. I didn't like my spicy squid salad though.  That was a letdown.  The pineapple fried rice was good though.  My husband said his beef curry was nice, as the beef wasn't stringy.  He hates stringy beef. We left very satisfied and stuffed.  Food was presented nicely, portions are big, restaurant is clean.  Very comfortable dining here than in SF. We will return.
Why can't the Peninsula have great Thai food? Is this really that hard? After reading the reviews on Yelp we looked forward to an exception to the rule but that was not the case. Very fast service but that was about the only positive. We had roti with geen curry. Greasy. We had pineapple fried rice. Have had better elsewhere. We had the chicken and asian eggplant. Just not memorable. The city has so many better options. I just don't get it.
Went to Rice tonight after seeing a decent Yelp write up.  We eat Thai a lot, and have spent some time in Thailand as well.  My favorite Thai in the US is still in Portland, OR -- Banh Thai. In the South Bay, I like Krung Thai and Thaiphoon. Rice disappointed me on multiple fronts. Here's the breakdown: 1.  Chicken Satay:  okay... but done with chicken breast (not the typical) -- traditional peanut satay sauce was nice, and the pickled cucumber okay.  I'd give it 3 stars, but 8 bucks for 4 small skewers drops this to 2 stars. 2.  Whole steamed lemon fish:  Allright... i'm in a Thai Restaurant... for 15 bucks I'm expecting pompano or pomfret, right?  Nah... it's a rainbow trout.  I dig in, thinking I'll give it a chance, and it's raw inside.  I like sushi as much as the next guy, but rainbow trout is not the thing you want to eat raw.  We sent it back... they cooked it a bit more, and  gave it back to us.... now... it's overdone and in rigor mortis.  Not to mention all the little trout rib bones we all hate.  Mental note guys... I'm Chinese and  I like whole steamed fish, but trout riblets even get to me.... the taste  was not impressive. 1 star for the fish.... drops to no stars after it was served raw and then steamed to mummification status. 3.  Panang Curry Chicken:  This is my standard dish and what I use to judge my Thai restaurants...  I always order it extra hot... the key is to be able to taste the subtle flavors of coconut, basil, chili, despite the heat.  Banh Thai in Portland mastered this... it should be complex in flavor with the burn...  Same thing I got in Thailand.  Today, it tasted like a jar of JIF or Skippy.  So much peanut butter, I started to worry about that peanut butter-related Salmonella outbreak.  It was sort of like Creamy Skippy with some ground chilis. No way -- dude.  There's never any left over curry for me.  I barely ate 2 scoops today. Zero stars on this folks. 4.  Brown Rice -- when do I ever review brown rice?  Never.  I have to do it here though.  I cook brown rice in my Asian Rice cooker all the time... y'all know the drill... it takes longer to cook brown rice than white rice cause you gotta presoak it... or else it comes out hard and dry.  For a restaurant's namesake "Rice Thai Cuisine"  you'd think the rice would at least be decent.  This stuff was hard and dried out. Mental note for Rice:  PRESOAK the brown rice. 5.  Service -- okay... so you served me raw fish and then dropped a peanut cluster bomb in the panang... at least come tell me there was a problem and either apologize or make an adjustment or something... instead they take my credit card without giving me the bill.  Mind you, I never was upset or complained this whole time. The waiter said, "Give me the card and I'll give you the check."  Ok. I obliged...  no adjustment.  I got charged 3 bucks for brown rice that sucked.  I was so mortified I didn't even complain or wince. We won't be back.   I'm a big Thai fan and I know my Thai food.  This was a global disappointment.  I'm willing to think I caught them on a bad night based on the other reviews, but at the prices they charge, I'm not willing to take another chance.  El Camino Real in Palo alto is tough competition.... take some notes from this review guys, and make it right!
Rice Thai is okay. Nothing fancy. However with the amount of other Thai restaurants in the area, this will probably be the last time I get food from here. The green curry was delicious, the crispy duck was way too dried out and the pad thai had a weird taste to it. Don't get me wrong, Rice Thai is not bad, I Just had better.
Just moved to the neighborhood and saw how highly rated Rice Thai was on Yelp - and it's a 5 minute walk from my house so thought I'd give it a try! I got takeout a couple of weeks ago (red curry with chicken) and sticky rice - it was okay.  I was craving pumpkin curry tonight and decided to give theirs a try.  I AM SO GLAD I DID!!  I got the veggie/tofu pumpkin curry and the thai eggplant with pork - with sticky rice, of course.  The variety of veggies in the thai eggplant was AWESOME - it was beautiful on the plate and the veggies were cooked perfectly!  The pumpkin curry could've used a little more pumpkin, in my opinion, but it was absolutely delicious and I cannot wait to go back.  So happy to have this little gem in the neighborhood! I've only gotten take out, but both times the gentlemen who answered the phone was very pleasant and the food was ready within 10 minutes.  The inside of the restaurant is beautifully decorated and hasn't been crowded either time I visited.  The people who work there are very friendly and had my food waiting when I arrived to pick it up. All in all, a Palo Alto/Mountain View treasure.
Just got back from a great late dinner at this fun Thai restaurant tucked between buildings on El Camino Real.  The duck curry and papaya salad were great, and it was especially refreshing to see some attention paid to the presentation of dishes. The waitstaff wasn't too shabby as well.  It's definitely worth a try - just make sure to drive slowly so you don't miss the teensy turn in to the parking lot.
Man oh man this place is fantastic! My fiance and I were hungry but ridiculously indecisive the other day so busted out the Yelp iPhone app to find someplace in Palo Alto apart from the "norm". Decided to look up a thai place we had been to before but the recent reviews (past few months) suggested a decrease in quality/change of ownership. Rice Thai was the highest reviewed and also away from busy downtown PA. What a find! We usually order yellow chicken curry at thai restaurants but the menu at Rice Thai is fairly large and EVERYTHING sounds great! Had the green curry roti to start, veggie and tofu pad thai, roasted duck red curry and a couple thai iced teas. Yay for FLAVOR! Each dish was prepared and presented beautifully. We can't wait to come back and try more!
Almost perfect pad thai! I eat thai food almost everyday, either at home or in resturants.  I tend to judge a thai resturant by the taste of their pad thai because if a place can do pad thai, they can do more complex flavors.  This place almost got it right, they just need to lighten up on the palm sugar.    It's slightly overpowering the other flavors.  Other than that, the noodles were nice and chewy (not soggy) and the tamarind and fish sauce and other flavors were well balanced.  I've also tried their noodle soups which tasty.  Next time, it'll be the curries. A note to veteran Thai food lovers, order it spicy here if you like things on the medium to spicy side.  A medium here is mild...., very mild. Reasonable prices, fast service when there's not a crowd, easy street parking (don't use their lot, it has no reliable exit), and this could be a new Thai favorite for you.
Loved it! What a great find. It's an unassuming Thai restaurant from the outside, but very nicely decorated on the inside. We ordered from the lunch special menus and everything were delicious. We had yellow curry, chicken satay, and drunken noodles. Lunch specials come with soup and spring rolls. Delicious and affordable.
Came here for dinner and tried the following: Pineapple fried rice - jasmine rice with meat, egg, pineapple, onion, peas, carrot and cashew nuts in a touch of yellow curry powder. Delicious and highly recommend. Sea bass green curry - sea bass with bamboo shoot, green bean, bell pepper, eggplant and basil in green curry. Very flavorful despite portion was small. This small restaurant is nice and clean with good vibe and modern decor. The reason for the 3 stars was because of inattentive service. You need to be patient and wait for someone to take your order. Don't expect anyone to look your way.  I ended up going to the register to pay.  Only come here for dinner if you are not in a rush!
We just came back from Rice Thai. Good food, reasonable for Palo Alto prices, a OK decor, but unfortunately service leaves much to be desired in the promptness department. Will be back because of the food, but might opt for the carry out next time. On a positive note, there were several people lingering around (couple on a date, friends catching up etc.) and they were not rushed, which is a plus in my book.
Solid 4 stars. My new favorite thai restaurant in the bay area. Ive been here twice in the past few weeks once for dinner and for lunch. Both times the restaurant was fairly empty.(maybe I came on an off day?) Service is quick and good. The decor is more modern and clean (not the usual gold idol statues and etc everywhere) The food is tasty tasty and the chef seems to know what he's doing. On to the menu pickings: Pass on: -thai egg roll-nothing special. I asked for extra lettuce to wrap with the egg rolls and they brought out plenty more for us -drunken noodle-this is a popular dish here but Im not a huge wide noodle fan...it was definately not bad. Thumbs jup: -green curry-definately need to get this, the curry has crack in it. =) -madam pompano-my signature dish at every thai restaurant. The taste and presentation is delish. -green curry roti-would prefer if it was slightly thinner and crispier but the sauce it comes with makes the dish worthwhile.
This is one of my new favorite lunch spots. I love the BANGKOK CHOW MAIN (and xxxtra hot). The location is great too! A very nice, clean, and modern dining area. The service is always good too! A must try if your in the Palo Alto area.
I have frequented RICE on numerous occasions since moving to the peninsula... but have been coming here for a good year prior to my move (when visiting family and friends in Palo Alto.)  I feel shamed to have waited so long to sing it's praises! Ricky (the owner) is the BOMB.  He will not steer you wrong... you want to do a substitution? No problem!  You want to take your time and hang out all night, or just order out... this place will serve you up in any way or fashion you please. The menu is fantastic.  I have not had a mediocre thing yet.  How on earth does someone make Pad Thai extraordinary? I have no idea, but the chef at RICE does!!  The Pumpkin Curry is delish, as well as the Sizzling Duck... I'm getting hungry just thinking about it! RUN - don't walk to RICE Thai Cuisine.  You will not be disappointed...
I grew up about 3 blocks away from the building that houses Rice Thai and, since the previous occupants were a Quizno's and a billiards hall, it's pretty safe to say that Rice is the the best incarnation. The location is a bit unusual (small standalone building with a rented cottage in the back of the parking lot and around the corner from two of Palo Alto's most famous [or infamous] liquor stores) and easy to miss. However, if you're looking for quick, reasonably-priced Thai food, Rice is a much better option than most other restaurants in the Palo Alto area. If you come later at night, it's also very safe because cops seem to like stopping by here for take-out pretty frequently. The service at Rice is very good. It's pretty clear that it's family-owned and that the proprietor's actually care about the customer experience, which is a big plus to me. The food at rice is also very strong. One of the things that I noticed right away was their use of fresh vegetables, particularly the bell peppers, onions, and carrots. Fresh vegetables that haven't been overcooked are a really important part of most Asian cuisines, and Rice does a great job in that respect. The dishes are simple, but they are attractively garnished and served on nice, modern dishware. In terms of specific recommendations, I particularly like the roti (which is not too greasy), the "swimming angel," and the spicy chicken curry. My mom also got the spicy noodle soup one time, and it looked excellent. Rice isn't dirt cheap, so be prepared for a bit of price inflation cause that's how PA rolls. However, most things are still under $10 and all said, it's well worth it.
This is a nice thai restaurant with nice atmosphere, good service, and decent food.  Nothing spectacular that blew me away.  I ordered the drunken noodles and my date ordered the spicy fried rice. We started off with a thai ice tea and spring rolls.  It was nicely presented, better than a lot of Thai restaurants.  The peanut sauce was very good and we ate all of it even after the rolls were gone. Regarding the entrees, I don't like spicy items so did not taste my date's meal.  My dish was a little spicy which made me not like it as much but heck, it was good and nicely seasoned with basil.  The noodles were cooked well and seasoned nicely without it being too oily or overwhelming. I would go there again if I was craving Thai.
My son loves their chicken Pad Thai!!  And he's only 20 months old.. Delicious food, relaxed atmosphere and friendly staff. I am definitely a fan of this place!
Yellow curry was delicious I recommend it highly. Service was okay, nothing great nothing horrible. Pad se-eu was okay definitely will be getting another curry next time.
This place is great! My husband and I are always complaining that there isn't any good thai food around palo alto, so we were excited to discover this place. I got sweet basil tofu and vegetables (i'm vegetarian and most of their dishes can be made vegetarian). I also tried the samosas. Everything was very hot and fresh, full of flavor, and relatively spicy (although, not as spicy as I would like). The place is family run and the service is great. It's very clean and nicely decorated. Prices are very reasonable. I'm happy they turned the building into a thai restaurant instead of the Quiznos that was there before.
I came here with my fiancee for dinner and was disappointed by one of their items.  We ordered curry chicken, fried fish with tangy sauce, and orange chicken.  I loved their fried fish but it was very expensive in comparison to the portion size.  They literally just give you 6 or 7 small (like a quarter size) pieces of fish.  I gulped 3 of them down in just 30 seconds. Their curry chicken tasted good. I really have no complaint about that.  However, their orange chicken is terrible. We only ordered this because of my fiancee--he really wanted orange chicken that night. The orange chicken was not crispy and was covered in mayo.  Isn't that a very strange combination for orange chicken? I wouldn't be able to tell it was orange chicken if it weren't for the small slices of oranges on the side as garnishment. Do not order orange chicken when you are here.
The first time I came to this place I thought the food was very delicious. Especially the fact that they make your food medium to hot spicy. The lunch special coconut soup is very tasty and the peanut dressing on the salad as well. When I come here I usually order red curry beef or the shrimp pad thai. But recently visiting for lunch the food had NO kind of flavor whats so ever!!!! Ill just stick to my usual Thai Restaurant every Friday
Of the three thai restaurants in the area that I've been to, Rice Thai is probably the best. I came here for lunch - and it wasn't too bad. The mussaman curry was quite tasty. The soup that came with lunch was delicious, the salad was just okay - they need to be a bit more careful picking out the bad lettuce out of the salad mix. Service was as expected, nothing to write home about. The location seems to be cursed for restaurants (quizno's, ramen club)  - I just hope they stick around so that I can go back. :o) Note: the parking lot is a joke, you're better off parking on El Camino.
Great food, good service, and reasonably priced. Very clean bathroom too! We go here often and enjoy its family friendly atmosphere. My son loves the Pad Thai!
Came here for lunch and got the lunch specials.  Ordered the pad thai and the green curry.  The food was very tasty.  The staff was friendly.  The portion sizes were great and the price was good too.  I believe it was $8.50 for the lunch special and it was very filling. Will definitely come here again.
The Pad Thai is really, really spicy. No, not "burn-your-insides" spicy, but "dropped-an-entire-jar-of-paprika-on-your-meal" spicy. The entire plate felt gritty, and all I could taste was the overpowering red spice. A bummer considering it's the closest Thai place to downtown Los Altos :(
I went there with my sister for a last dinner together before she moves out of CA to relax and enjoy the last night. The waitress was VERY rude. We ordered a curry and asked to have the spiciness in mild level. She brought a very hot spicy dish, when we reminded her, she took the dish without saying " sorry" just changed the soup around the meat/vegetables and brought the same thing back. She was also very late in attending our tables while there were not many people in the restaurant. When we asked to box the remaining of the dinner, she brought the boxes to the table, poured things into boxes on our table while dropping forks and plates on the table with so much noise. The guy at the door was not polite too. I live 2 blocks down and LOVE Thai food but will never go there again
Came here with colleagues for lunch and the food was good, nothing extra special. The service was bad. I asked for brown rice and they gave white rice and when I asked to change, they used the same plate and replaced the rice splashing the curry in the plate. They also messed up my colleague's order. They brought red curry instead of green and on top of that they wouldn't even change back despite of their mistake.
Lunch specials include: Salad - peanut sauce dressing The salad was a typical green salad, but the peanut dressing was an A+. And Fried Veggie spring roll - was bland, the only flavor detected was the from the wrappings. And Soup - a very mild hot and sour soup Seafood green curry over rice . Sauce was a bit thin; there was really no complexity to the flavors.  The seafood included scallop and mussels. Sweet basil chicken over rice Good flavor, nice mild spicy finish to the dish.  My only criticism would be the chicken pieces were not marinated, it would be fine for the thin pieces, but the thicker pieces were not as flavorful.  Dish also was made with red & green bell peppers, yellow onions and basil. Note- all 3 items (salad, spring roll and entree + rice) were served on a single really cute white triangular plate. The Men's restroom was relatively clean, but had an industrial feel to it, that did not match the restaurant's dining areas decor.  The dining has a very modern artsy type feel.  The walls were dark and there were benches with back pillows along the walls for seating.  There is a ample lighting from the widows that ringed the walls. This place would be a good dining place for friends and co-workers to go, but as a romantic dining locale, the windows just will ruin the mood. Watch out for parking....the parking lot along the side of the building have you entering one way and exiting down an ally.
Let me expand on my boyfriend's review (see below) and possibly reiterate a few important facts about Rice: The food is really yummy. Like he said, the curries all taste the same. We once asked to substitute green beans for bell peppers in one of the curry dishes and got the response "No, no... no. No, we can't do that. No" which leads me to believe that the owner knows we're on to his curry scheme. That being said, they all taste really good. I like yellow the best because it has potatoes.. at least, I think it's the yellow. The man who I assume is the owner is super ultra sweet. I'm here at least once a week (I imagine boyfriend probably 3-4 times on the sly) and he's been friendly and accommodating each and every time. Once we didn't have quite enough for our order and he told us to just pay him next time. The $20 minimum for credit cards is obnoxious but understandable, and I don't give it much thought anymore. I recommend the eggplant dish with chicken if you're looking for something a little bit healthier than curry. Oh, and unlike someone down below, I think that getting just one serving of rice for two people is just fine if you're splitting an entree.
I agree with Luke - if you want fine cuisine or an "authentic" experience, look elsewhere.  But if you're looking for tasty, saucy dishes with good flavor and nice presentation, then this is the spot for you. It's also got two other great pluses going for them: - they're very vegi-friendly - the decor is a step up from your usual thai place. We're locals and live in the neighborhood and have been about a half a dozen times, and will continue going back. The owner is friendly, the food good, and it's great to find a veg-friendly thai place where you don;t have to worry about fish sauce in all the dishes.
Aside from the area behind the host booth (and hopefully the kitchen) this restaurant was very clean and tastefully decorated. I just remember seeing a bunch of racks of sodas, boxes and jackets strewn about, almost a makeshift storage area rather than a clean dedicated front counter/host station. I just think they could class up their first impression, since it doesn't currently match the rest of the interior or the awesome quality of their food. We sat at one of the tables while waiting for our takeout (the place was practically empty on Sunday at lunch time) and were tempted to stay and dine in. Due to other plans we didn't stay, but the tables were near windows, under which they had bench style seating. All pretty nice and serene. The samosas were a nice appetizer and the sweet chili dipping sauce complimented them very well. We both had pad thai, I had chicken, she had veggie, and both were very good and plentiful. The proportions of ingredients was perfectly balanced (no giant piles of bean sprouts) making for very good texture and flavor. Sticky rice with mango had sesame seeds on top and was loaded with fresh mango slices, but there was very little of the sweet white sauce on the rice, and what little they did pour in was all in the crack of one side of the to go box - not much on the rice. While the dessert still got inhaled, it could have been prepared with better care. Perhaps a dine in experience will add that last star, but I still think the first impression is holding them back. 2nd time I got take-out here was NOTHING like the first.  I asked for some hot sauce, and first they handed me some plum sauce.  Once that was corrected, I got home and unpacked everything to find there was no sweet chili sauce for the samosas, and the pad thai was not up to par.  No peanuts in the pad thai, and it was very oily.  They did a good job the first time, but the second visit was a huge turn-off. "Next."
Service seems to have gotten a lot worse lately. Expect to wait 10 minutes to order or receive water while the waitresses chit chat amongst themselves in the kitchen.
Delicious, well prices and authentic!!
The bf and I were both super hungry and craving thai food for dinner and ended up here based on the great yelp reviews.  Unfortunately, our experience wasn't as great as our fellow yelpers. We were seated by the window and there were fruit flies, but we were also close to the door, so whatever.   We order chicken egg rolls, green curry with seafood, sticky rice, pineapple fried rice with tofu, and thai iced tea. Our server brings us plates and mine has gunk stuck on it.  Definitely strike one. The food: -thai iced tea was okay, but I've had better. -I didn't eat the egg rolls, but both the bf and I thought they smelled like McDonald's. -the pineapple fried rice was really oily and bland.  It was also mostly rice, with some peas, a few pieces of broccoli and pineapple and a lot of really small dry pieces of tofu and cashews.  I had to ask for chili peppers to give it some flavor.  Neither me nor the bf liked this dish, but he liked the tofu better than I did.  I don't like it when it's fried so much the inside is almost gone, which is how it appeared to me, but he thought it was good, so at least the tofu is a matter of personal taste. -the green curry with seafood was pretty good.  It was served with a tortilla on top, which I thought was weird, but the flavors were nice.  It could have been spicier, but when we got our check we learned they'd made ours mild.  So, apparently mild is the default. Our takeaways: -service was pretty good -cleanliness was questionable -food was too greasy, bland, and not satisfying -we won't be back
The food was quite fantastic, had the green curry chicken, and pad thai, pad thai is rather different here and worth a try. The inside of the restaurant is pleasant, but was quite cold on a rainy Sunday afternoon, and the failure to bring waters after asking twice was a little perturbing. Just finished the leftovers tonight, and they were still delicious, but little details like heat and water, might be make or break for a new restaurant trying to survive on El Camino.
Three of us, we had 1. Appetizer combo (was pretty good, especially the chicken satay) 2. Chicken Pad see ew (pretty good) 3. Duck curry (was okay, duck was fat and sauce a little plain) 4. Lemon grass crispy fish (good presentation, fish is a little tasteless) Attentive service. Nice environment. Will come back again.
I love Rice Thai! The food is fantastic, service is great, simple ambiance and Ricky the owner goes out of his way to treat his customers with care and get to know them. I have brought co-workers, friends and family and all have fallen in love with Rice! My family now chooses it for birthday dinners and we love trying new things from the menu so we can say we tried it all- everything we've had has been delicious. When I go in with co-workers, we always get in and out in a timely manner (note: we typically go in a little before noon) and the lunch special deals are a large amount of food for around $10 (although it would be less if you don't get meat and stick with white rice). I always end up taking half of my food home and it's equally good for leftovers. Ricky knows all of our regular orders and is great at helping indecisive diners choose a great dish. This is a great place for a single diner, date night, quick lunch or group dinner. Don't miss this wonderful hidden gem!!!!
I concur with the #1 complaint from most reviewers: Poor service, bad attitude. The waiters think they are too good for serving food. Guess what dumbos, thank your stars you have this job. You aint gonna be good at doing much of anything else. Average food. The owner seems a nice enough guy.
If you can go at lunch, this is just about the best place in the world. If not, it's a little more pricey, but still amazing! Ricky (owner) is super nice and goes out of his way to make your meal pleasant. I LOVE the Coconut Noodle Soup. I seriously can't get enough. I go two to three time a month for lunch, so I've tried the whole lunch menu and everything is good. I love all the curry's too. Parking can be a hassle but the do handle groups pretty well.
Another instance where yelp has led me astray. I split the pad thai with shrimp and tofu with a co-worker and was glad I did--because if ordered my own I'd have felt I wasted my money. There was nothing wrong with the texture or quality of the noodles/ingredients. It was just bland, completely tasteless. I thought pad thai was a pretty standard dish to master. Our other co-worker ordered the pineapple fried rice and concurred that sometimes it isn't always a good idea to try something new.
My new favorite Thai Restaurant.   While the location off El Camino leaves something to be desired, the restaurant is very nice inside and exudes the charm of a small family run cafe in Thailand.  Hey , after all, this place is a thai family run cafe, but in palo alto.   The food was all amazingly fresh and delicious. Lets face it, the bay area has about 5 million thai restaurants, so it really says something that this one stands out!   Everything was amazing from the peanut sauce on the veggie-shrimp rolls tasting like it was just whipped together minutes before to the homemade broth for the tom yom soup - fresh and delicious.   So Fresh!  Did i mention fresh?  The papaya salad is amazing too. Go!   Oh, and oddly it's never crowded which is just another nice note.
Read this carefully, as I am a Thai fanatic... -Pad Thai was not good. Very dry and bland with thinner than usual noodles. -green curry w chicken was very good as most ppl post, I thought it was very tasty. -sampler platter wasn't good. Fried bland food. -as a comment to what most ppl say about the terrible service: the lady who first greeted us didn't actually greet us, nor did she respond to anything we said. Our actual waitress was very very nice and helpful though. -Tom yum moong should not cost so much either. Oddly high priced soups. Overall: will NOT go back for dinner, might crave the green curry soon though.
Amazing pad tse eu and drunken noodle. Good service, friendly. Quick service and wonderful decor.  Has a fresh feel, and innovative daily specials (such as a curry that contained pumpkin).  Worth trying out.
Best yellow curry chicken ever!  The chicken they use is white breast meat for all their dishes...it's not that nasty brown rubbery meat that other Asian restaurants use.  Plus their pineapple fried rice is pretty amazing as well.  We always come here for pick-up and they're fast and friendly.
The uneven reviews here suggest varying expectations, so let me set yours where they belong: if you want fine cuisine or an "authentic" experience, look elsewhere.  But if you're looking for tasty, saucy noms on the cheap, then this is the spot for you. The curries are all good, though if you come here often you will notice that they all taste more or less the same.  I like the green curry best, but then I'm a sucker for eggplant. I have never ordered any meat other than chicken, which means thin slices of breast meat that are usually surprisingly tender for a $8 lunch/$10 dinner entree.  Unless you are a lumberjack or a glutton, two servings of rice make most dishes suffice to feed a pair. That, plus the quick, friendly service (I have never waited longer than 10 minutes when ordering take-out, and once they brought my food out to me when I waited out front in my car) has made this one of the go-to local spots for the girlfriend and me.
This is my favorite neighborhood restaurant. Small, friendly with excellently prepared food. I took my 6 yo guest there and they were so nice and accommodating to him, as well as to us. Every dish we ordered was exceptional: mine was Swimming Angel fish and also had the Chicken as well. Brown rice was perfectly cooked, not over blown, nutty and delish! The food is very fresh and well prepared. The ambiance comfortable and pleasant. I had lunch once, it's inexpensive, but I think doesn't compare with the preparation and care of the dinners.  I could easily go here every day for dinner.
Great place to go for lunch when you're looking for a taste of thai.  Not the best, but overall decent and satisfies the quick lunch craving.
I've had a wonderful meal there. The food was exceptionally well plated: I don't usually see that kind of attention to detail in a restaurant in this price range. The squid salad and thai curry were both wonderful. I love the decor as well-it could use a bit more natural light, but other than that the colors and furniture looked fresh and comfortable. I would definitely go back again.
I had the red curry and a hot tea, and my friend had pad see ew without the veggies.  Mine was good; she needed hot sauce to spice things up, but I don't really hold that against them for a veggie-less noodle plate. Other reports of them charging a dollar for rice are accurate, even though I ordered a curry, which isn't really practical to eat without rice. This strikes me as petty and makes me not want to patronize them again.
Rice is a gem of a restuarant in a low key location in S Palo Alto right on the El Camino Real.  Every meal there has been excellent.  The Sea Bass Green Curry is amazing. The flavors in all their dishes are sophisticated, yet understated.  It's a 'can't miss' low key restuarant that goes toe to toe with Tamarine in DT Paly.  Their papaya salad is great. Try the Drunken Noodle dishes. Nothing with dissapoint you.  An excellent find for South Palo Alto. Park in the old Blockbuster lot right next to Jim Davis Valero.
3.5 stars rounded up.  I'm glad to have discovered this place, thanks to Yelp.   My boyfriend and I came here today for our weekly lunch date - its very convenient for us since its about halfway between our respective workplaces.   Their lunch specials have a good variety of rice & noodle dishes and are mostly $7.95 for chicken/beef/tofu, which is very competitive pricing for the area.  They also come with a soup, which was pretty good, a salad, which my bf said was mediocre, and an eggroll that was quite good.    We both had the pad thai, with chicken for me and beef for him.  It was beautifully plated and was a fairly good-sized portion for the price.  While it wasn't the best pad thai I've ever had, it wasn't bad (I'd give it a B+).   Having read reviews on Yelp about a lack of sprouts/peanuts, I asked for extra peanuts, which were given to me at no charge.  I thought there were plenty of sprouts, but am glad I asked for extra peanuts.   We avoided the lunch rush since we arrived at 1:30, and there was plenty of parking in their lot (4 spaces total).  Service was still a tad slow despite the fairly empty restaurant. Bottom line: While the food here didn't blow me away, it was pretty good, and given the well-priced lunch specials ($7.95) and the convenient location, I'm sure we'll be back.
Food very good. Drunken noodles with chicken- wow! Green beans were also a highlight. Atmosphere is nice and lively. Service is kind and fairly quick
Delicious take-out from this restaurant! We first had vegetable samosas and Blanket Shrimp appetizers, both very tasty and delicious. For dinner, we ordered Yellow Chicken Curry and a Penang Curry with Tofu, and both were simply delicious and delightful. Well flavored, filling but not too heavy, fresh tasty ingredients. You get your choice of jasmine rice, brown rice, or "sticky" rice. Highly recommended. Parking is a bit difficult, so we usually do take-out here, but if you can find parking, they have plenty of room to eat in as well.
This is a great lunch place (haven't been for dinner yet).  The lunch menu is reasonably priced and you get a good amount of food.  I love the Drunken Noodles and Pumpkin Curry.  Very good Thai cuisine!
There are not that many good Thai places in Palo Alto.  This place is a gem.  The service is great, always friendly, prompt, clean.  The prices are very reasonable.  I love the steamed lemon fish.  It is so tender and delicious.  Other faves include the pumpkin curry and the spicy eggplant.  Take-out is also really convenient and fast.
I love this place!  Not only is the food delicious, everyone who works here is so nice.
Great Thai spot, especially for lunch. I ordered Drunken noodles (delish). Meal came with small portion of soup and salad as well as a spring roll. Not much street parking but there is a free parking lot a couple of doors down. Overall, I highly recommend. Enjoy.
My in-laws live around the corner and we all eat here regularly (dine-in and take-out) and I've only had great experiences. The food's delightful (great portions, fresh, not greasy), and the service is fine--although the place can be busy at lunch. The parking lot is way too small, and street parking's not great on this stretch of El Camino. Overall, Rice is always a great value. One member of our party is deathly allergic to certain nuts, and the staff at Rice has ALWAYS been totally helpful in making sure that specific dishes are nut-free. Of course we have an epipen handy since this is literally a life-and-death matter, but I really appreciate Rice's attention to detail here.
Great food, very flavorful and tasty. I give it four stars based on the food only. The waiter never came back to check on us. And the parking is bad there. I would go back though.
Let me start by saying the food is really great quality but the service and attitude of the wait staff is just not tolerable. After being bitten a few times I thought let me try once more .Ya right. With about 8 of us we walk-in at 8:15pm and are seated and the first thing that  we are told is order quickly as we will close at 9:30pm We were really rushed into ordering and then they got the order wrong on 1 dish. At that point the waitress starts to blame us and another passerby waitress also makes some remarks. Had to walk off the table at that point and they still thought we should pay for the food which was still not even served. Sorry but management needs to get their act together or they will be shutting soon.
My favorite new to place to dine. Have probably eaten here or ordered take out  50 times in the last year.   Absolutely addicted to the Red Curry over pineapple fried rice.   Just had garlic eggplant the other day. Another super savory dish.   Used to be a Quiznos       what an improvement !!!  Enjoy !!!
Very good place to have a quick meal.
I just had dinner there tonight with some classmates, and I would recommend it. I had their Hot and Sour Soup with fish, which was great...and the smaller-size bowl was enough for a meal. My friend had Drunken Noodles and really enjoyed that, too. The food is elegantly presented, the wait staff are attentive (I don't think my water glass ever got below half full), and the food is excellent. Definitely the best Thai food I've had in awhile, and at a surprisingly low price.
Went here this afternoon at 4pm because I was craving Pad See Ew, but all the thai places in Mountain View were closed from 3pm-5pm. My order of Pad See Ew with beef came out really quickly and smelled delicious. When I got home and looked at it, it looked lighter than others I've had before from other restaurants, but the same flavor was there. Overall, I'll be returning to eat there and try out a few other dishes. The price was decent. For Beef Pad See Ew, I got double the portion for less than what I pay for at Shana Thai in Mountain View (which is where I normally go locally for Thai food).
Yellow Curry to die for!! Panang is fantastic as well. I was out here for a few days and ended up coming here twice because the food was THAT good!
Nice, neat, nothing crazy or fancy.  What you order is what you get (read the descriptions carefully).  Yummy food!   My favorite is the drunken noodles.
Excellent food, quite inexpensive.
Another face in the crowd of Thai restaurants in this area. Pretty decent food. It was a little too oily for my taste. I liked the presentation and the service was efficient. Parking is a pain with only 4-5 spots other than street parking. Probably why it was pretty empty during lunch hour.
Had the Seafood Salad, curry, Seafood Island dish, and sweet & sour chicken dish.  All very good!  My friends come here for lunch all the time and introduced me.  The service, ambiance, and decor were perfect.
the 4 starts is just for the food. probably the better thai place in PA for lunch. whenever i feel like thai food this is the place i go. food is good, not greasy. lunch special comes with small soup, salad + egg roll. good size meal for under $10. my only complain would be service. if it's crowded, things will take a while. if it's empty then service is fine. most of the times place is mostly full, but they only have 2 waitresses and it seems like they only have one cook in the back. figures.
I walked in right at closing a couple of nights ago and was able to get last minute take out.  I ordered the shrimp rolls with peanut sauce and the drunken noodles vegetarian style.  Food was average and made an enjoyable meal in front of the couch.  I do highly recommend the coconut juices though  which have a bunch of thick coconut slices at the bottom of the cup.  I typically test Thai restaurants with a curry dish but just didn't have the desire to do so that particular night.  Not the best parking situation at the restaurant.  I recommend parking by Blockbuster and just walking over as opposed to their little parking alley.
Yummy!!! Loved the Coconut Milk Soup. I got it with tofu and it was tasty! Also tried the Pad Thai! Good...not the best but good. Will def be back!
I have been to Rice probably 6 times, and have had a good meal, and good service every time.  It is a relatively inexpensive neighborhood restaurant, where the owner (along with members of his family) are always on site. I'm not an expert on Asian cuisines, but I used to run a restaurant so I do know when food is freshly prepared, served immediately after preparation, and served with good presentation in a clean and comfortable atmosphere by servers who are glad to see you again. I think this is a very nice place for a small office group to go to -- since it is inexpensive and pretty fast -- especially if the group has vegetarians in it.  There is a good variety of vegetarian food on the menu (nearly anything with meat in it can be prepared without). Go and have a good time and good food!
went here around 9PM for a late dinner, and thought it was closed at first because the parking lot was empty.  fortunately it was still open, and we were seated immediately. the server was very attentive, probably because we were the only ones there, and was very friendly and helpful.  we ended up ordering 3 dishes for 2 people. beef pad thai: standard fare, hard to go wrong here, but tasted a little bland drunken noodles with chicken: significantly sweeter than i expected, and could have used a bit more spice panang curry with chicken: probably the best dish of the night, the curry was flavorful, though the chicken a bit lighter and drier than usual overall, the food was nothing special, though i must note the presentation of the food was above average and was quite pleasing to the eye.  in addition, the restaurant itself is very clean and the furnishings feel very new.
I tried this place the other week because a menu was strategically placed on my windshield while parked at work. I'm a sucker for Thai food, so..... I had the papaya, a green curry and the fried banana/honey dessert ( I ordered so much because there was a $20 minimum for credit cards, I never carry cash). The papaya was very well balanced, the curry was also prepared deliciously- and both plated very entertainingly. I've never had the fried banana dessert, I thought it was lacking a bit because the banana's weren't sweet. This place is very trendy, just as I like my eateries. I got to talk to the owner who was very nice, service was great. I brought my leftovers home and my hubby ate it up. I'll be back Rice Thai.. with some cash.
We strolled in a couple minutes before close and they were nice enough to seat us. I wasn't expecting high quality, but boy was I wrong! I ordered basil eggplant with beef and tofu - and it was actually very good. We also ordered the lemongrass chicken, which was fresh and came with lots of steamed veggies. The place is very clean and modern inside too. Will be back!
Came here on a lazy Sunday afternoon and ordered a Pad Thai and some curry. The service is wonderful and the food is just like what's expected. The presentation is nice for Thai food. It's a nice drop-by place for Thai food that's not in a busy epicenter of restaurants.
As a Thai person, I approve of this restaurant.  Excellent tasting food nicely presented.  Great service!  The waiter is really polite and helpful.
Best Thai food in palo alto-hands down, but worst service in palo alto as well. After my husband and i waited far too long one to many times, we decided that we will only do take out there. The REd Curry and Drunken Noodles are really good!
I decided on a personal boycott of this place. It's not because the food - i'm sure it's still good. Because I specifically said we needed to leave in 45 minutes for a meeting and could we please get the food quickly? OK so we were there at regular lunch hour, it was relatively busy, but come on, what kind of restaurant doesn't help out its lunch regulars now and then? I didn't ask for anything that seemed unreasonable and we go often enough the owner knows my coworkers' food choices by memory. Needless to say we were late for the meeting. Prior to this lunch fiasco, we were contemplating not going as frequently since the service is highly variable - some days it was OK and other days you waited, and waited...
This place is less than a year old, but my coworkers & I come often for lunch. The lunch noodle... Read more 
Boy am I glad I tried this place. Thanks to all of the yelpers who led me here.  We had the Country Style Hot and Sour soup to start and it was soooo delicious with a wonderful basil flavor.  For the main course I had the Chang Mai with beef and my daughter had the Red Curry with chicken.  They were both sooo good.  Next time I want to try to Asian Eggplant.  The service was friendly and prompt.
Went here for the first time today and really liked the food. I had the Fresh rolls, love that the peanut sauce was warm and the rolls were really fresh. Also had the Red chicken curry with brown rice. The chicken was really tender and the vegetable were cooked just right. Only thing I didn't like was I got a refill of diet coke and I got charged for 2, I should have been told that the refills were not free. So next time I will stick to water. Presentation of the food  was excellent. Will be back again to try more dishes.
Decent Thai food is hard to find in Palo Alto.  Not sure if there are any Thai restaurants on University but it is definitely the best one south of there.  It has a good variety.  The curry is solid and you can't beat the lunch special.  Soup, side salad, egg roll, curry and rice all for $7.75!  You really can't beat the price for the area.  Normally I find asian food to be quite bland in Palo alto.  Happy to add this to my lunch spot list.
My coworkers and I had been coming here since they opened the first week. The owner is really nice and is always friendly - plus the food is always good. However, the service has really gone down the hole lately. So much so that we don't come here anymore, which is a shame. It's a clean place with good and cheap food and is a great place for lunch in Palo Alto with small parties. It gets busy at lunch time and the problem is that there are only 2 servers working. To be brutally honest neither of them are really good, or quick, or on the ball. I've been to places that seem like they're understaffed and they just move quick and get orders in, food out, and refill your drinks in a hurry. Unfortunately this is not so here. The last time we went the service was terrible. Trying to just order food took forever. Then waiting for the food took forever. Then trying to get the bill took forever. Then that was it, we haven't been back since. It's a shame really. As others have said, parking sucks. But we've always parked in the alley out back or on the street out front. The wall separating the restroom and the restaurant is also super thin, and hilarity may ensue depending on where you sit and the maturity level of your party. I'd come back in the future, maybe on an odd weekend or during dinner when it's not busy. However, as our once staple lunch place, it's been crossed off the list.
This is a nice family run business with a few interesting selections on the menu that are hard to find in Thai eateries in the US.  The quality of the food is good, but not great.  I would certainly return here for a quick lunch, but would not recommend it as a place for a sit down dinner.
I came here for lunch today with a couple coworkers. It definitely doesn't look like much from the outside but I was pleasantly surprised to see that the inside is really cute. I ordered the red curry with beef. DELICIOUS! It was spicy but not too spicy, creamy but not too creamy, and had plenty of beef and veggies (not all sauce). It's a big portion but you know what, I ate ALL of it. Ya, it was that good. And it came with a veggie spring roll, soup, and small salad for $7.95. Can you beat that? The only negative with the food was the salad which had a few wilty looking leaves and some sort of strange peanut dressing (delicious but didn't seem to belong on a salad). Our servers (there seem to be 2 for the whole restaurant) were super friendly and remembered someone I was with from a previous time he had eaten there. The other people I was with ordered the spicy noodle soup, the sweet basil beef, and some noodle dish that looked like wide pad thai noodles. Everyone was raving about the food. A lot of people have complained about the $20 minimum. If you have a visa or mastercard, they can't actually refuse to let you pay with a credit card but they don't want to because they have to pay a 2% fee on the transaction. Just leave a big tip :-)
Been here twice -- both take-out -- and was impressed each time with the quality and uniqueness of the dishes. The curries are excellent and the salads quite refreshing. Pleasant staff who will guide your selections, if needed.
Really good Thai food.  I'm tempted to rate it a 5 because it is so much better than any of the other places around (i.e. Thaiphoon - sucks, Krung - mediocre at best, Old Siam - unremarkable).  Service is great, the Thai iced tea is very well made, pad thai is yummy, and they put a lot of veggies in their dishes.  For example, the roti came with grilled eggplant (awesome!) and the pad thai was chock full of zucchini and bean sprouts.  For such a well-balanced meal, the prices are very low.
I dropped by here for lunch right at 11am when they opened. I picked it because it was a Thai place with the best reviews in PA. I The lunch specials are great and decently priced. I ordered the chicken and eggplant and it comes with soup, salad and eggroll. Not bad. My friend had ordered the pumpkin curry which seemed very interesting since I have not heard of it before. We were able to beat the lunch crowd since people started piling in at 12. The only bad thing is lack of parking but I got there early so it was not a problem.
Great thai restaurant and loved the food. Found this restaurant on Yelp and the reviews are accurate. I went here with a coworker and the restaurant is easy to find but parking may not be easy. There are 4 spots right before the restaurant so if that is full you will have to park on the street or the other side. We parked on the other side and crossed the street. The place is clean and decorated nicely. There are lots of tables and chairs to fit a lot of people. The decor was simple and pleasing. We were able to order our food pretty quickly.  I ordered the Green Curry with Chicken and Thai Iced tea from their lunch menu. The waiter served us a bowl of soup while our food was being made and the soup was yummy. A few minutes later our food was ready just in time. The food was presented really well.My food was served on a triangle plate with salad, an egg roll cut in two, a cup of rice and with my main dish in a bowl. The sides were both delicious and not bland. The green curry was very good and not spicy at all. The vegetables were fresh and still crunchy. I finished all my food except for the rice and it was very delicious. The staff had great service, the decor was good and the food is very good. It's a great restaurant to go to when you want to eat Thai food.
My co-workers and I come here all the time .  The store is hard to see from El camino and the parking is pretty small so be prepared to park on the street.  Overall the food is great the the staff is very friendly.
Great food, beautiful presentation, reasonable prices, sweet staff, and warm decor. The location is a bit inconvenient, but it's worth the search for a parking spot. You can get any kind of soup in a one-cup serving, so you can warm up without filling up. The wrapped shrimp appetizer was crisp and delicately flavored, The basil beef had a very nice balance of herb and spice, and the curry sauce didn't hide the flavor and texture of the duck. Our new favorite for sure.
The food is inconsistent. I've been here a few times, hoping I just came on a bad day but no such luck. Their pad Thai is sooo bland. They don't even include the basic vegetables like bean sprouts, carrots, lime or even peanuts. Their chicken curry was pretty flavorful as well as their soups, but not worth the terrible service. My last visit was on mothers day, and being a holiday, you would think they would hire enough staff. With a full restaurant and only one server plus one person at the front counter, service was incredibly slow. They served us our soup but did not give us bowls or spoons to eat it with. I ordered rice but it didn't come and I had to ask for it twice. No one came around with the check and I had to ask THREE times! Don't these people want to get paid?! I noticed the service was just as bad with our neighboring tables. I really wanted to like this place, but it's just not worth it.
After reading the other positive reviews and looking for a nice Thai place close to my home, I ventured into Rice Thai Cuisine. I had been avoiding the place after my experience at ramen club, the restaurant that occupied the space earlier. Just a warning, you might miss the parking lot. Just remember the turn is right after happy donuts. The server was very kind, as he always had a smile on his face. The decor is nothing to write home about, but other than the large window looking out at a brick wall and the not so sturdy tables, it looks nice. One wall has some crevices with candles inside that look nice. For lunch my friend and I ordered Thai iced teas, a chicken satay, a duck curry, and a Shrimp Pad See Ew. The Thai Iced Tea's taste is good, but my glass was almost completely filled with ice, making the quantity smaller than at other restaurants. The Chicken Satay was very nice, with very tender meat. It was a little bit bland, but still very good nonetheless. The cucumbers on the side were fresh, unlike some other places. The portions are nice and large, but I don't guarantee that you will have leftovers. My Shrimp Pad See Ew actually only came with 8 shrimps, which disappointed me because Dexter said that he got 10. Well anyways, the shrimps were seasoned very nicely and the noodles were not too oily. They had a very good sweet and savoury taste. A 8/10. My friend complained about his Duck Curry being too watery, and when I tried some, it was definitely very watered down. I am not factoring this into my review, as I did not even try the duck meat, but I would warn you about trying this dish. Our meal ended up costing $43, as the satay was $8 while my Pad See Ew was only $10. I will skip it next time, as the satay is rather small. In conclusion, this is the best Thai restaurant in terms of area and quality to me, but it may not be necessary to drive over here if you live more than 30 minutes away. And I might hit up Krung Thai if we want curry next time.
I come to Rice often for lunch.  The lunch specials are pretty good.  With tax and tip it ends up being about $10 a person. I have tried the curries, pad thai, pad see ew and the regular noodle soup.  All are good and come with egg rolls/salad and a bowl of soup. My favorite is the pad thai with tofu.  The pad see ew is not as good as Krung Thai down the street.  The curries are good.  The soup noodles are light and great for a cold day. So I recommend Rice for lunch if you work near by.
We visited this place for a team lunch and it was an enjoyable experience but with a few "foibles" along the way. PROS: - Great food. - Polite staff NEUTRAL: - Somewhat limited menu - Limited parking CONS: - It took upwards of 10-15 minutes to get menus AFTER we were seated.
This place is like a hidden gem. My husband and I LOVE Thai food, but we have never been more impressed at any other Thai restaurants than the service and quality of food at Rice Thai cuisine. The restaurant exterior is nothing spectacular, so it's easy to miss if you are driving on El Camino, looking for this place. However, the interior is very clean and nicely decorated. The waiters/waitresses we have encountered so far have been kind, cheerful, and helpful. Most importantly though, the food is  what makes this place the best Thai restaurant in town. They are very flavorful without being greasy or overwhelming. Portions are pretty good. The presentation is also very elegant. We have tried their pad see-ew, pad thai, mango fried rice, and yellow curry. All of them were amazing. You must try.
I love Rice.  The food is great, it's inexpensive and the staff are always friendly and helpful.  We go around once a month and it's always delicious.  We went just last night, and everything was great as usual. Go now!
We live in MP but were in the area and decided to give Rice a try.  First off, the weather isn't that hot.  We got in there and it was very warm inside the restaurant.  We got there on the early side (before 6pm) so we thought they'll turn on the AC soon.  No!!  The food arrived and I have to say the food is good.  I would give it a 4.  We ordered pad see ew, pad thai, pineapple fried rice and the yellow curry.  The quality of food is comparable to the thai restaurants in our area.  But we got so hot we lost our appetite.  We packed the food up to go and ate at home. The service was also lacking.  My experience with most Thai restaurants have been very pleasant.  The waiters/waitresses are always smiling, and helpful.  Not here!!  The waitresses were very abrupt.  I'm not sure if I'll come back.
green curry! papaya salad!!!! OMG!!! I got a eating frenzy there!!!!
Like this place, good main course curries and rice.. didnt like the roti paratha here, the rest was great !!! Nice Ambience..!
I've been looking for a Thai place close to home for a while, and I think I've found it. It was quick and friendly, reasonably priced, and I went home with leftovers because of the great portions. I had the panang curry with chicken, and my friend had the teriyaiki chicken. We were well pleased. The hot and sour soup was worthwhile as well, but it *is* hot (and wonderfully so). I'm only holding back that last star because it was my first time. If it continues to perform well I'll update.
Pros: I must agree with this Xavier M. fellow from Burlingame. So far I have enjoyed the Sweet and Sour chicken and the Drunken Noodle. Although I have noticed a disproportionate amount of orders for the Bangkok noodles. Seems alot of people order that. I'll try that out next. Also note: The food is dressed really fancy. :-) Cons: The parking is horrible!!! They tend to be short handed and so things take longer then they really should for such a small place.
I've been going to this restaurant since it opened up and it is my new favorite Thai restaurant on the peninsula.  The owner is incredibly friendly, makes an effort to remember my name and the food is great for the price. The food is freshly prepared and it seems fairly healthy.  The ingredients used in the food is quite authentic.  I go to SE Asia quite often and measure Thai restaurant standards with their Tom Yum soup. I wouldn't go on a first date here but I think it is a great place to grab a casual lunch.
I love Thai food and this place is great. I really hope it survives because the food is really good. During my three visits, I've tried the sea bass curry (excellent!), grilled pork salad, larb pork salad, BBQ beef salad, coconut chicken soup. All have been exceptional and presentation very nice. The decor is trendy, yet relaxed. It's a good place to bring kids as well. I'm always looking for good thai food and I'm happy that Rice Thai Cuisine is now in the neighborhood.
As far as Thai food goes, it was ok. Wait staff was pushy to get our order, actually waved a menu at me. And then wouldn't come back to fill our waters. Only reason I give the extra star is presentation was nice (triangle plates, what symmetry!). Had four at the table, 3 had chicken, 1 had beef, 3 had upset stomachs.
The place can't be more than 2 years old but is a most needed ethnic venue in the cultural void that is South Palo Alto.  Between Siam Royal/Thaiphoon in downtown PA and Krung Thai/Amarin in Mountain View, this is somewhat hidden surprise in this part of town.  Love the Green Curry Roti, Tom Ka Gai (coconut soup), pineapple fried rice, and anything in panang/green curry.  The Pad Thai is quite excellent and I've had a great Soft Shell Crab dish which is not listed on their online menu (?).  Red Curry dishes are also good but perhaps not as memorable.  The (one) host/waiter has a quirky and dry sense of humor, so pay attention closely since you may not realize he is joking around (Insert Russell Peters impersonation here).  He usually has a big smile on his face after he makes his jokes.  He has a funky pair of glass frames which he changes at the end of the day (I was there one time after closing and he changed his glasses (???).  Perhaps the funky pair are nonprescription and he puts on reading glasses later to tally the bills?  Yes, I digress.  He's really nice but somewhat odd in a good way.  This place is not usually crowded (and not sure why. Limited parking perhaps? new? poor publicity?) so it is easy to hold conversations, which are not so easy at some of the aforementioned places above. Food: 4-5 Service: 4 Helpful staff but stretched thin (maybe trying to save money in this economic downturn?). Decor: 4 Modern, clean with some asian/thai accents. Price: 5 Great quality and portions for the price. Noise: 5 You can hear your table mates easily since it never seems to get that crowded. Parking: 3 Limited spaces- try to find one on El Camino itself. Overall: 4-5 (rounding up in the Yelp rating)
This place was fine but nothing special. A couple friends and I got take out--I had the green chicken curry. I've been to some pretty great Thai places (not around here; just moved here and still haven't found great Thai yet) so I have a high standard, but I wouldn't rush back to this place. I might go back if I don't find a great place because it was decent, but nothing incredible
A bit pricey but excellent service and tasty food. A very nice addition to the Barron Park neighborhood.
This place is excellent!!! For and average priced Thai place, with a decent interior, Rice Thai is amazing! Fresh, well prepared, and presented with love, this makes for my favorite Thai food in all of Palo Alto! Thanks Rice Thai for the consistently epic meals..
Disappointing. Appetizer Roti was greasy. Pad Thai did not taste like Pad Thai- in fact it had a strange taste. Coconut juice was artificially sweet and tasted like it was poured out of a can rather than from a real coconut. Brown rice was not available when we were there, and the service ws so-so.
Nowhere near good enough. I had the Indian Roti and Coconut Soup and my friend had the Mussaman Curry. Disappointment all around - the bread was good, the green curry dipping sauce was super liquidy with floating carrots and peas. The coconut milk was too strong in the soup and apparently they can't cook chicken or are using crappy chicken meat. All I know about the Mussaman is my friend said "this is not mussaman" soooo it wasn't awful, I finished most of the meal but I won't go back again.
had a good first impression with the eggplant dish.  flavors were on, vegetables were fresh, was a little on the sweet side though.  unfortunately can't take the kra tong thong to go.
As I was trying to gnaw through one of the tough, sinewy beef strips in the dish that I ordered, I kept thinking that it was the nastiest Thai food I'd had in a long time.  Maybe ever.  The spring rolls were OK, but not enough to make up for it.  Service was polite but they messed up my order the first time (although maybe they were trying to steer me away from the beef).  The wife liked her Pad See Ew, so I'll give it two stars.
We discovered this wonderful family-run restaurant shortly after it opened and have been returning every week or two ever since.  The food is excellent, the presentation artful, and the staff is exceptionally friendly and welcoming.  A friend from Thailand maintains that Rice serves the most authentic and best state-side Thai food she has had outside of Thailand.  The food is exceptionally fresh, herbs and spices are blended with care and make each dish come alive. I also am completely astonished at some of the negative comments people have written - We go here a lot and have never had a bad dish.  The incredibly friendly staff is reason enough to go - But the taste of any of the House-specialty dishes will bring you back again.  We strongly recommend this family-run new Thai restaurant.
Nice decor presentation of the food was good Had the soft shelled crab - nice but was supposed to have basil in it, but did have any in it. Other food was good, but nothing different or outstanding in it Server was very indifferent to our group Would go to eat again, but might try other places first
Good, spicy Thai food. Service could be a little better--some co-workers won't even go here--but the good food makes up for it.
Wow, this place is amazing.  We ordered the following dishes and were blown away!  Finally a great Thai place !!! We ordered the spicy hot and sour soup with Shrimp...best we have had in ages!!!  Our heads were sweating! Imperial Rolls, perfect!!! Chicken Satay...can not go wrong...moist and wonderful Pad See Noodles with chicken...out of this world...have not had this quality for years! The lemongrass fried fish was amazing!!!  Perfect sized chunks of delicate fish fried and served in a bowl of fried noodles with a lovely and refreshing lemongrass dipping sauce. The fried banana and strawberry ice cream was a hit with the kids too!  So amazing!!! Why were more people not in here?  I don't understand why someone would bother going to Mountain View, Menlo Park or Downtown PA when we have this!
I like this place. Although I've never dined in it (as I've realized that it is often empty) I have taken out their pad thai a good 10+ times and have sincerely enjoyed it. Their food can be as spicy as you wish, and is more elegantly presented than you would expect at any other ordinary thai establishment. If in need of a pad thai, I would recommend stopping by. But the reason I come here so often for take outs is because of the manager(?)/receptionist. He is very kind and is glad to accomodate for any substitutions or dietary restrictions diners may have. One time, I forgot to bring my wallet and was sad that I could not order a pad thai. However, since it was my 8th or so time at the place, he gave me some yummy appetizers to take home.
I went to Rice last night for dinner with a group of friends and loved it.  They really try and go the extra mile on things like presentation (the veggie eggrolls came arranged in a large martini glass with a train of garnish spilling down of the side to the plate), and really attentive service.  I spent some timing living in Southern Thailand and this restaurant had all of my favorite dishes, including Panang and massamun curry, sweet and sour veggies, and tom kha soup (although they translate it into English).  They even had CHANG beer!  For those of you who have gone to Thailand before you'll know that Chang and Singha are the two major Thai beer companies. But as far as I knew, Singha was the only one that was exported from Thailand.  I have never seen Chang in the USA before. I would definitely recommend this restaurant if you want some authentic Thai food and a nice atmosphere.  My Panang Curry was spot on Yum
Good, family run Thai place. Parking is tricky. The food is good, especially the black rice pudding. Prices are definitely reasonable/cheap. I would recommend it to my friends.
In light of the prices, the food is excellent. The people are great, too.
We left the restaurant disappointed.  Overall the food was very mediocre.  The green curry roti was the most disappointing, I would give it a 1 star.  If you've had the real roti before you will not like this roti.  Roti supposed to be soft and light and fluffy, and the curry is usually very tasty (try Banana Leaf at Milpitas, only $2.95 I think).  The roti here is like a chinese pancake, but it's thick and greasy, and the curry is awesome, super salty and super sweet.  For $7.50 this was totally a rip off.  The pad thai was alright, lack the "fire taste" and nothing to take home about, would give a 3 star.  The basil with pork was the best dish - the pork was tender, flavor was right on, and the veggies are cooked perfectly.  I would give this dish a 4 star.  So overall this place is more like a 2.5-3 star, would not come here again given that there are so many great thai restaurants here.
I've been searching for a good carry out thai place.  I went to Rice Thai several months ago and got the basil chicken which is my go to thai dish.  It was just okay.  Next I tried Thaiphoon which was excellent and I will never go anywhere else.  BUT, the parking at Thaiphoon on a Saturday night is a nightmare so I went back to Rice Thai for some carryout.  I ordered the drunken chicken noodles based on the recommendations in yelp and I was very disappointed.  It was totally bland and had no heat whatsoever.  Most thai restaurants ask you "how spicy" you want certain dishes and they did not but I didn't realize it until I got home and tasted the dish.  I also got the red curry chicken which I did actually like but I do not plan on going back.
pad see ew here is very dry. it has good wok hay, but I would definitely not get it again.
This place is delicious!  The food here has ruined all other Thai food restaurants for me...  In addition to the great food, the staff here is very attentive & friendly. We love the Pad See Ew & always order it.  The owner remembers this & starts preparing it the second we walk in the door!  The Thai Egg Rolls & Rice Pudding are faves too :)  If you like Thai food, be sure to check out Rice!
Best thia food. I have tried more than 50 thai restaurant and everytime I order Red Curry. These guys are just best. Must try.
The food was better than we could have hoped for! We always drive past it but have never eaten there - now my two friends and I have vowed to be regulars! The food was presented simply, yet elegantly. I would recommend Rice Thai Cuisine to any and all who want to try some authentic Thai food!
This restaurant was average overall. The food was OK, and the selection good, but the price was a little higher than some other local Thai restaurants for the size of the portions, and the service quite slow.
Food here is really good and pretty affordable.  Presentation is great and the staff is quite friendly.  Definitely happy this place is in the neighborhood!  Parking lot is somewhat small so if you can find a spot on the street, take it.
Good Thai food!
We were unable to park during the week and tried it on a Saturday.  It has now become our favorite Thai restaurant in the area.  The presentation was great and the food was  wonderful.  We ordered the seafood dishes and were happy with the spiciness of everything. They don't overdo the oil and don't use MSG.   We intend to return often.
We love Rice!  Our family goes there often and the food is always really  good.  The portions are big and the prices are reasonable.  The service is good, the decor is pleasant and the atmosphere is relaxed.  Ricky the owner recognizes us now and is always very friendly.
The lunch special is affordable and really delicious.  They give you a nice bowl of really tasty soup to enjoy while waiting for the meal which is nice.  I like places that give me something to eat while I'm waiting for the main course.  The presentation is nice.  They serve it on a triangular plate.  Also, it came within ten minutes after I ordered which is important to me since I only have an hour to eat lunch.  If you are really hungry you might leave not satisfied but if you are trying to drop a few pounds by eating high quality healthy food this is a good place to eat.
This is a Thai food lover's dream. The quality of the food is outstanding and attractively presented,  the portion sizes are generous, and the prices are really reasonable. I've been here at least 7 times already.The coconut soup I ordered today was really flavorful and tangy. The fish dishes are outstanding. One of my favorites is a wonderful sea bass green curry. And today I ordered a whole fish poached in lime juice and garlic. It was light and delicate, cooked perfectly;  just amazing! My wife always orders her favorite, Rice's yellow curry. I'm not usually a fan of brown rice, but the Japanese brown rice they serve is a good match with the flavorful sauces from the entrees. Try to save some room for dessert and order the fried banana and coconut ice cream - they are made for each other!  The owner, Ricky, is a wonderful host. Rice is a small restaurant, a bit off the beaten track for restaurants in Palo Alto - it's along El Camino a mile or so south of the Page Mill / Research Park intersection. But don"t miss it!
It is hard for me to think of an overall better Thai restaurant in the area. The food is great, the meat is of good quality, the portions are big and the prices (for this area) are very reasonable. The menu is extensive and creative. My only gripe is that they only allow you to charge 20$ or more. Although I suppose this is reasonable, and I do get out of hand with splitting checks with multiple cards, it is an inconvenience.
Best lunch deal for a gourmet Thai lunch you will find.  I friend had Pad Thai with pork and I had green curry seafood.  Both great. Friendly staff, good service.  I
Very pleasantly surprised. Nice presentation, tasty food, quick and friendly service. Parking is a little tricky, but I will definitely go back.
The Pad Thai was great.  The spring roll was small.  Overall, the portion was great for lunch.  The only issue was the parking.  They have a lot that only holds 4 cars, and it is difficult to manuever if you pull in and need to back out.  So, if you go, park at Jamba Juice down the street.
the waitresses were really nice and the food was really good. when i took the first bite of the pad see yew, it didn't have the sticky MSG flavor that hits your taste buds, which is really good. i hoped the portions were a bit bigger, but the flavor of the noodles were great overall.
what would make Rice Thai a better restaurant is improved service.  all four dishes we ordered were very good, so would definitely consider take out.  it is hard to believe it's been in biz for over a year bc of the inattentive and amateur service.  no one came to take our order.  confusion over who was waiting on our table.  dishes were not cleared.  to go boxes handed to us in a pile, and we had to ask for a bag.  i actually hope they read this, bc these small steps in basic customer service would go a long way.  otherwise, the restaurant was great!
I have eaten at Rice many times. I'm working my way through the menu. The lunch special is a very good value -- $7.95 for soup, egg roll, your choice of meat or veggie main item, rice, and a salad.   Lots of food and all delicious.  I've had the green papaya salad several times; it is especially refreshing on a hot day.  Several people have reported problems with the Pad Thai, but in my opinion, it is one of the best I've had. This is the only Thai restaurant I've eaten at where the chicken is not overcooked and stringy. Most places have it pre-cooked and then cook it more before serving. I'm not sure if theirs is done by the same method, but it comes to the diner perfectly cooked.  I also like their wine by the glass served in very nice, thin-rimmed stemware, which makes me feel like I'm in a fine dining establishment. The owner and staff are all very nice.  I've also had take-out, by which I judge many restaurants, because some cheat you the portions or the amount of protein knowing you're probably not going to bring it back once you get home. This is certainly not the case with Rice; the take-out is just as delicious and plentiful as when served in the restaurant.
All our family love Thai cuisine. I'd say we've been to almost all of them from San Francisco to Palo Alto. This one is the worst. Served for three: Seafood soup should be the Seafod Soup, not filled with cheap mushrooms, 2 shrimps, 2 scallops, 3 tiny pieces of squid and deluted broth, that was terrible for starters (no usual thai spices at all as everywhere else); Seafood salad was several tiny pieces of something, 2 shrimps, bunch of greens (not usual thai greens and spices), overcooked rice noodle floating in vinegar. They do not even have hot thai tea. The service was very unprofessional, we asked them to serve entres after soup and salad, instead entres were served first, so they got cold by the time we finished our soup and salad. Portions are about twice smaller than you would nomally expect in Thai restaurants. Prices are higher than in the Siam Royal on Uversity Ave. in Palo Alto. - simly a ripoff. And this one is located far away from the city center. Avoid, do not repeat our mistake !!!
